Buy some boss fight books

Buy some boss fight books

2019-02-09-15-16-21

Notes notes

Love the dead grandpa I have never met, and he's be a solid book. He made an impact on so many people. Probably should talk to them before they are dead.

Love the dead grandpa I have never met, and he's be a solid book. He made an impact on so many people. Probably should talk to them before they are dead.

Let's take SIM on the road

Not the product, the team. Work on a secret project, just for you. Do it yourself instead of asking for others. Doing it with Drew would be fun, but who knows is he has time or wants to spend his out of work time
Most people come into work and just start writing and write all day long. Is anyone stepping back and checking out an old part of the project and dusting it off? Cleaning out the excess and documenting where things are gross. Get numbers for things. Measure and be precise. Learn this system you appear to love. Hold store report service sometime, hide away from the office so you can do other work. Join Drew in his coding time, work on your own thing. Just stay on task for a couple hours and move on.

Am I the person I am when I am high or when I am stoned?

What does sober Chris do. He will wake up, get a cup o joe (2 presses chocolate latte, start chocolate espresso and dance after 2-3 seconds. 
In order for anything to be legitimate, you have to check in on it. Releasing something into the wild means nothing. Taking that idea and putting into the world with effort is separate from letting it go when it's half grown. All these services in SIM are started services, some are at least. Cleaning up code is fine, but look where we are and what our system is like. Do an analysis on SIM and figure out how to make some results. Study the topics you need to make it good. You can't do it by yourself and it's not you life but if you are going to craft something, craft the fuck out of it. Who cares if the company is immoral, all companies are immoral. Money isn't evil, money isn't always insidious. The objective of a thing is different than its effect. What do people think of that Nike add? Do they add historical value with Jordan or is it a sexual harassment machine with money to spare.
Rambles and rambles, dumping your thoughts down. You want to let your kitty, you want to give up your phone. You don't want to stop and you want to keep going all night. Is this actually who you are? You are heating up and shaking and pounding and roughing and leaving and going and coming and there world and the nothing, soh d off the bytes and keep it here/ write what you want I don't give a full. People me in peace or let me die, I am a racist, a sinner, a garbage piece of this garbage world. Things are shit. You can be scared. Let your self be scared some times. Is this cathartic or is it torture? Do you benefit from keeping yourself together if all you want to do is split apart atom by atom into the dawn. You are falling off the wave, the energy is decreasing, this is a narrative told to you from your brain gun wagon, this quick demise. He's slightly manic you say and you go how the fuck are you not? Oh yeah, apathy, laziness, this need to always be taken off your feet. It's great that you have all this stuff and don't know what to do with it. Just keep floating and touching no nerves. You have to wash your face tonight. Sadly you have to clam and let yourself go. This was Chris it's been a pleasure, tell you mother that she is fine (avg). 

Random things to do that would make our house more effective. It's our shield.

Put butter in fridge at night and take out in morn - too much effort?
Let your love be your love. Helen is well a custom to pleasure. She's the dark side of me. Dark is too harsh. You understand her, most of the time. She so far, has kept the same pattern. She spends lots of money and wears expensive makeup. You have learned from ignorance to excited about it. Is that your shield? No it's not. I love Helen with my everything, I would burn the sun for her. When I am high my stomach gets crunched up and shaky thinking about her. She's my everything,  slightly cliche but whatever. She's a pool of radience right to my poplar tree. Someone is a little too high I see. Dump the train don't dump the fire and word meaningful or do they desire, it's random it's phrase it's be our guest it's our lion king it's our dream it what I mean let go go go this dreary nightmarish day or whatever. This sin hole this-

What is a typical day for you like?

What is a typical day for you like?
How do you motivate yourself when you feel like trash?

Mini project ideas

Server for mud
Service for book sharing (scan in books, hydrate with data, endpoints for current lists of books, graphql/elasticsearch (live typing results)
Socket-based encrypted chat client 

This is pedantic as shit, but J seeing my piercing earlier but not saying anything about it kind of sucks. That puts me even lower in their friend-hierarchy. I'm back to questioning if it even should be called friendship. It's a one-way relationship at th

This is pedantic as shit, but J seeing my piercing earlier but not saying anything about it kind of sucks. That puts me even lower in their friend-hierarchy. I'm back to questioning if it even should be called friendship. It's a one-way relationship at the best of times. God I'm tired of it. It worries me that if I stop trying that the relationship would die, but maybe that should just happen. I don't feel like it's worth it to say “hey pay attention to me” if they obviously have too much going on.
It's time to call it quits, let it die. Find better friends, they are amazing but not worth spending your limited time on if they never reciprocate.

Note

Weird question: Could you tell me where I stand with you? My critical 

Note


recommendations

Scarlett - Drew
Fatale -Drew
How to change your mind - Jenna
Mutant message down under - nature conservatory person
Schitts creek - Cassidy
Cascade - Jenna
Banner of the damned - (Danille/Dany, Erik's wife)
Log Horizon - Todd
Monstress - Dany
Knights ofCydonia - Todd
Shutter - DanY
Lazarus (graphic novel) - Dany/Erik 
Hyperion - Todd 
Alex - Highly Senstive Person
Better than thieves - Jon
Omnigraffle - Lilith
Mixer (app) -Lilith
Jeff Lin - trash electrics donation
Paxton gate - Lilith
Pepperbox (Sw breakfast tacos) - Jenna
Shipt (grocery delivery) - Cassidy 
Tunify - Cassidy
Itchiza
Super Deluxe - Lyft driver
Gay and wonderous life of Caleb gallows- Cassidy

Lhirettes?

Turning head at desk, chin at different angles. Sometimes just one shock, but can be up to 4 in a row. Bam Bam Bam Bam. Sometimes I'm not even moving that much

Maybe we should de/prioritize PR reviews as the main source of cronyism. Maybe we should check the tests and results to know that they match what we're trying to write. Maybe avg. response time instead of code coverage. We're buried in too much code. Code

Maybe we should de/prioritize PR reviews as the main source of cronyism. Maybe we should check the tests and results to know that they match what we're trying to write. Maybe avg. response time instead of code coverage. We're buried in too much code. Code is magic, code isfun, and it's a skill to be worked on. Creating software that works quickly and is Mai tunable is a different skill set. Showing off those services, making them USABLE. 

Note


Being frightened about what people will think of my piercing in the moment is not playing the long game

A given moment is gone at once, a single day is nothing. You have limited infinite days. There's no time limit but there is a time limit.

In order to fix SIM, we have to shed our old beliefs about it. Raise our expectations about what we can do and what we expect ourselves to do. Don't get sucked up in other people expectations.

In order to fix SIM, we have to shed our old beliefs about it. Raise our expectations about what we can do and what we expect ourselves to do. Don't get sucked up in other people expectations.

If that courage quote is right

Then I am courageous sometimes. Not always. When it comes to people I love or even just like sometimes getting treated unfairly. I'll shake and I'll drill and

How can I pivot with this fucking party that won't just work out? The two people I wanted won't be there. So what do we do instead? Invite nerds over to play board games? Disinvite Jon? Invite Donald? See if James wants to spontaneously drive down to Port

How can I pivot with this fucking party that won't just work out? The two people I wanted won't be there. So what do we do instead? Invite nerds over to play board games? Disinvite Jon? Invite Donald? See if James wants to spontaneously drive down to Portland? I don't hang out with anyone else enough to want them to come over. Alex could invite his bud

Note

Powdered sugar
Salted butter
Canola oil
Grapes
Clementines
Lime
Goat cheese
Blue cheese - get some good shit 
Sharp cheddar 
Baguette - get a good one, maybe Ken's?
Crackers 
Good dark chocolate
1 rose
1 sparkling
Ginger brew
Cranberry juice?
Heavy cream
Coffee 
Eggs

What am I? I think about power dynamics and how to best use it, even if I do the opposite. I like chaos sometimes, if I don't want something, it means I should do that thing. If someone absolutely doesn't want to try something, to me, the next logical ste

What am I? I think about power dynamics and how to best use it, even if I do the opposite. I like chaos sometimes, if I don't want something, it means I should do that thing. If someone absolutely doesn't want to try something, to me, the next logical step is to try it. Saying “I'm never going to do this thing” is just one projection of your mind at an instant, it isn't. Rule. Your thoughts are meant to be subverted. Break out of the call that holds you down and makes you avoid eye contact. Be true love, be a brother and a sister.

How do I break habits that you and your family have always had? What people expect of you


Basic as shit get to know you games


Helens pizza tour

Helens pizza tour

Make something for Helens wand


Play FF 13


Go hiking. Be interestingly


Getting better at writing

Handwrite/type out good books
Digest the books you read
Read a lot of books
Write everyday
Do I really want to do this?

https://www.gq.com/story/st-vincent-and-art-of-never-being-boring


Notice your emotions

What is this emotion? What am I reacting to? We think our thoughts are true. Often our thinking tells painful realities that we don't want to admit. 
Common:
I'm sure my new bf is cheating on me
What are your thoughts?
What words are you describe the person? Are you thoughts accurate? Am I using my past to justify your current thinking?
Notice your behavior.
Why am I acting this way? What is motivating my behavior? What do I not want to admit to myself and why?
It my veil, it's my thought barrier. I've talked about it many times. It's the weave constricting my brain. It's the lies and it's the truths filtered it's the thoughts believed. It's going with that describing rather than the source. It's the headline reading and the skimming and cheating and barely making your way, just surviving off your intellect and never doing much of anything besides gaming. There is something wrong with you.
Why do I tell myself I am wrong all the time? Am I the deception or the truths? Do I lie to my therapist? Do I make up stories and never let her have a turn? Do I make people like me by lying about myself? What and who am I?
Am I sick on my days off or do I not want to go to work? Isn't that the same thing? Isn't that okay? You are honest about the truth though. You lie, little by little. Cassidy thinks you are honest, and you are, it's just that you keep living with the weight crashing down on you. You are the character in the sitcom who just can't do anything right but just keeps on trucking and telling themselves that they are great.
Are we a mean, back-talking family? Yes. But a lot of the dysfunctional ones are. God are we legit dysfunctional? Honestly, I don't know.
I like to think that a lot of us are like this, but I think it's true. It's the plugging away day by day, riding the comfy job and every crumbles around you. People are dying and people are sick but you tell yourself you want to work on you.
You do not try and you waste the time of people who have valuable things to do. Working hard is a rarity, you float along and cast your spell and leave with a wad of cash in your hands. You can't construct a life around yourself so you just swerve and swerve and never actually crash, just hanging on.
A dead thing with no past and no future. Deep down you do not ageee with the things gd you tell yourself.
You and Herb encourage each other's bad behavior. I describe Helen as a ball buster but I think it's true.
Or do I think of Helen as someone who gets too angry at little things? I join along in that boat. Talking about reality tv and feeling bad for ourselves but never really doing anything about it. Just trying to exist with what little control you have and just keep riding the waves down to your grave.
Is my wiring just my thought barrier filed by nothing? Just my own me? You don't have to lie about how much you love yourself. Sometimes you think you are def obsessed but you don't lie about it. 
It's only self-deception if you believe your lies.
What have you lied about in the last week?
Lying is a common action often used to minimize conflict.
Did I scam my way through College? Take tests, not really learn anything? You got carried away trying to be whatever you are not.
Or is that imposter syndrome? It's pathological lying? Is being anxious about lying just the ultimate lie? It's the circling and circling and believing . Do you follow the positive thoughts or the trueful ones? Is there a trust? It's the post truth age after all. The internet is one big construct built up of small little lies that stretch and expand on the higher and higher castles.
You don't know truth unless you asked a question.
Do you lie to yourself or others often?
Lying is normal behavior built on fear:
What are you afraid of? 
That the other person won't believe you or the information is somehow harmful? What should you say? You ususally end up making a lie. Is staying home from work a lie? You don't lie, or you don't believe the truth. You just want a day off because you don't sleep well and you don't want to start your new ticket? Is it how you avoid work you don't want to start or am intimidated by without actually having to do anything? Is writing the tickets for a story that important? Is framing of the work as good as accomplishing it? Are you a liar spinning webs and dragging people down with you?
Would you trust you? No. You don't do any research besides what you need for the moment. You are a scam artist, throwing something g together off of nothing. You also never remember anything, but it may just be that you do not practice. You want to do something as easy as possible, just let your creative birds fly.
Your code is expressive and unique? It's boring, uneducated, and rote. Who is actually good? Is it possible to keep a position based on the fact that you are good at solving problems but not good at keeping a system afloat? Do little actions not add up to the high action? Is everyday it's own episode or is it a page in the book? What is the overall: Now, before, or later?
Do you think you lie or do you get scared that you lie because you don't have time to process the truth? Do you live on the shoals where your thoughts touch the shape of the thoughts instead of the substance? The inner truth, not the brief lie. You are fun and you lie and you truth and you smoosh it together and wrong them both out.
What is truth? You are worried that nothing is truth and everything is fragile perspective? How can we say anything defjnirtely when studies have been falsified or exaggerated or lied about. What and where is truth?
Capitalism is self-deception

I want to learn how to dance/take a dance class


Book swap

swap -> register location -> first item is free, must complete deliveries in order to  do any more
when you request an item, you pick the pickup location       
when you are ready to return you pick a drop off
any things you need in order to deliver or use will be distributed by the network
books, household goods
would need to keep track of credit card info (or a cash deposit? how to support homeless community?) in case item is not returned
special auth for people registering w/o card, by application only? 
app would send notifications about future deliveries.
must specify a region and time that you would be available to make a delivery
goal is to be sustainable and eliminate need for cars due to public transit / small delivery hops across the city
see how you would do it without an app and see if its worth building

Fuck the larger than life good or bad shit. Make choices everyday slowly. Anti racism research and practice is some of the best things you can do, don't take that for granted

Fuck the larger than life good or bad shit. Make choices everyday slowly. Anti racism research and practice is some of the best things you can do, don't take that for granted

Put electronics in crate I the 1x4

Put electronics in crate I the 1x4

Note

Second show in a row that I didn't realize I was watching the finale. It makes a lot more sense now. The crazy fusions, basically giving us everything that we've been waiting for. The showdown with white.

My friendships fell apart because they wern't strong enough

Back up. If Casey and I had a solid friendship, then would we have made it past Ashley? Adam and I? Ben and I? Whats the common factor here. Your emotinal availibility, perhaps? Your mom lost a friend when you moved away. You could maintain her in your 5 relationship spots. Who else would you put in? Helen, Drew, Cassidy. Lots of people you feel close with but don't keep the connection up. You fizzle out. Do they understand you are scared? Maybe they are too. Your friends are the people who are there through the different waves, rocks on the beach. God I hope I don't like Cassidy more than she likes me. She told me about her mugging.

I am not a good friend of J/D

We're just not there. We don't have one of those relationships. I really like them but we wouldnt ask the other to help me move or feel that inclined about it. Maybe I made a mistake with Jon. I think having Cassidy around subverts that some. Maybe that's what bothers me about Jenna. I know where I stand. But is that the case? Maybe that's why talking about shit is hard. But we've told each other shit. Can you have close work buddies but not real friends. Maybe I should stop pushing and move on.
I wasn't good friends with Casey. Was he a glorified gaming buddy? But we talked all the time. But he annoyed the fuck out of you sometime. Did you have anyone who you were excited for when they did something well. I think my thoughts are not see through to this time anymore. 
Drew and Cassidy are friends.
Jon and Drew are not friends. 

Game thoughts

Using cunning to delay the inevitable rather than actually go to and complete something. Bracing against the world rather than invading the world.
 
As Penelope, stalk the grounds, using wit and charm and tricks and lies to distract suitors until Odysseus comes home. It's not a power fantasy, in fact you have very little power. Cannot leave the estate, as the suitors would do even more damage than they have already done.
Try to keep enough food and wine? Keep track of supplies? Her willpower should be unending, as fitting for a character in a Greek work. 
Overhear or ask slaves what is happening elsewhere on the estate. Keep track of tasks as rumors or guesses. Maybe the suitor has wandered off already after doing enough damage.
Does this sound fun? Does it have to be?

J

Does J ever hang out with anyone who isn't S's friends? Is it always going to be his friends over us. That's what it seems like. There are times at work, sure. There are lunches and one Saturday. But no real drive to do anything and she's much more inclined to say yes than actually do anything. Which I also understand.
God I feel like I'm close to understanding. Being in someone else's city. She's the outsider who came into a land where her F was already integrated. You sewed yourself on. You have your own people, sure. But how to work friends compare to people they've known their entire lives? What's the point?
She's expressed this before. D has expressed that he thinks she has her own stuff going on and doesn't need us. That might be true. I've felt hurt by her never coming over to my desk to socialize. She called me one of her favorite people on SIM. We've got something going on
Maybe she's used to people coming over there. Maybe I don't want to be a person who comes. I want to be a person people come to, then it makes me uncomfortable. You'd rather go someplace else and spread your body all over. Hello over there; totals over there. You don't want to be a Casey, be a Jon, be a Donald. You wanted to be a Drew but he's like you, needy and lonesome and afraid. 
Maybe she is too. She has way more stuff going on in her life than you. The sexual assault thing. Getting married. Her parents not doing well. Her sister never coming to visit and going to miss buying a dress. Some of that is a lot.
What is wrong with being the person who hunts after socialization and doesn't let the fact that no one comes to him as a challenge. Maybe people think because you are quiet and won't open up that you have your shit together and you are never lonely. You might have to just hang out with someone else who is lonely, they are more apt to hang out.
I see some of my own Shit in her. Maybe I am projecting. It's the way she becomes attached to him when he is around. Some times splitting off, but when it gets quiet, he's the person you go to. That's not right yet. It's the way you are always positioning yourself towards him. It's the. “Traditional” inspired paring that can lead to over dependence. You want her to be free to do her own shit.

Saw-ray

Fancy invitations
Billionaire banshee
High class (looking) food - charcuterie, fried chick peas, crustinis

Note

Hey Ken, I think Jon had the right idea about using PTO today. I'd like to use some of mine if it works out okay. Besides the long weekend, I am beat from not sleeping. Regardless of my use of PTO, I am going to wrap up my high priority work this morning (like the Chile incident from the other night)

Do meals with friends, focused on having a bunch of different types of veggies, fruit, whole grain, fish, healthy fats

Do meals with friends, focused on having a bunch of different types of veggies, fruit, whole grain, fish, healthy fats
Drink black coffee tomorrow
Fuck all that sugar, you need to figure out how to block it out. Don't listen to yourself when you go for one. And lol at focusing on nutrition after reading and thinking about death.
Fuck the past, treat people like this is the first and last time you will ever see them. Cherish the moments.
If my dad wants to change our relationship at all, we could recenter ourselves. Listen and maybe not understand but accept that you may never.
We create hell
Write or make something about death
Let's focus on cooking and eating well and hastily this weekend. Lots of different veggies, let's make a salad or something. Just dump veggies on my place. Maybe fish!
Vegetarians plus fish
Let's make a “fancy” meal with smal proportions and amazing design. Cooking club. I love clubs.
Find a place to work that reflects your values. Return some emails

Sometimes I want you to back the fuck off

Sometimes I want you to back the fuck off
If you are going to be in standup as a leader, then act like a fucking leader and stand up and put away your laptop 

He's not contributing to the process. He's being self centered and ignoring the greater plans.

He's not contributing to the process. He's being self centered and ignoring the greater plans.
I think he suffers from a lack of self awareness, or at least from sharing it from anyone. He does not try to be close with his squad and he is like me which really bothers me because I am trying to be better.

What sucks is I feel like when I take a more active role in the sprint, you come in and take over or not pick and tell people to do things without considering the greater plan. I care about how we work with each other, not what gets done. We get our work

What sucks is I feel like when I take a more active role in the sprint, you come in and take over or not pick and tell people to do things without considering the greater plan. I care about how we work with each other, not what gets done. We get our work done better when we communicate and we know when to step back. I am a senior engineer and you do not treat me like one. You question literally everything and it drives me insane. You are disroectful. We're not al equal. I am an engineer 3 as well and I am supposed to be a leader but you constantly shit all over it. I feel like you shut me down when I am trying to take a more active role. I love doing that shit, I like taking care of problems, you don't need to manage me, I am not an idiot, you are not my boss. Back the fuck up or just talk to me like a team member rather than a peon.

Advice you give yourself and don't listen to

Don't do what people want you to. Expectatio a are poison. You should talk with Erik because no one thinks you will. It's ballsier than a Bose ring. You talk a big game but you don't do any of it. You used to think you were an open book but you are closed off. You let some people peek in. Give them a little ray of sunshine. You don't like it. You feel uncomfortable. The truth is you don't always like spending time by yourself. You want to be around people. You need to get to know people. 
You want other people to do this ha they are afraid of. You don't have to go over the deep end, but you have to start trying somewhere. Maybe talking with Erik isn't the top of the list. It's at the bottom. He's the base of the cliff. He's the bottom rung. You are afraid of so much out there, dealing with him everyday will give you a chance to start somewhere. You want to be positive change, you want to be the dynamo you know is in there. You'll set up after this. You want to be a ray of sunshine but the world pulls you down. You hope people understand why. Your head roars with trust, the rushing crashing waves of gold spinning in your head. You are all and you are nothing. You will be in the ground and your family and friends will weep. You will weep when your wife dies, a sibling dies, your father dies, your mother dies. Those are barriers and things that hold you back. The past is gone and what you did yesterday does not matter. The morning comes with the crash of false truth and you won't let it pull you back now. Be the truth when you can, be the persona in public. You don't have to express yourself all the time, but you don't have to lie. Sometimes lying is okay. Never lie to yourself.  Never believe the lies you tell yourself when you want something. It will always be convincing in the moment, you know yourself very well, you know where to pull up the plates off the frame and dig around inside. You k ow where the button are, where the cords go in. You lie and you are scared and you know that. That makes it hard to be truth sometimes. You don't have to lie but you don't have to talk. Ignore you. We are done with you. Show this to your therapist, this is an order. Tomorrow you will feel embarrassed about this because you don't want to let yourself be naked.
 What are the things you are afraid of? You've made up feeling and ran with them before based on some random affect your body had. Sometimes you get excited and angry but your brain tells you a lot of stupid shit. Sometimes it doesn't. Man who do you believe? No one. Everyone. You have to get to know them. Gut feelings aren't the brain, the brain is what Epps translate and put together. Not every thought is correct. Only use the ones that you know are right and don't be afraid to let them all in.
Are you attracted to men? No. Are you attracted to women? I don't know. The idea of a woman? A strong woman holding me up and kissing me goodnight? Do I want a strong woman because my mother is strong? Probably. Strong women are the best. Strong means nothing, it's a useless word. Are you attracted to your wife? Sometimes. Especially when you are not in a bad move. You aren't attracted all the time but when she does she sets you ablaze. You feeling very strongly about things and there's not often a middle ground. You are an empath and you feel a lot and you just need to let it in and allow it to leave. Let it roll through and enjoying as another summer storm or spring breeze passing through the way to heaven. 
You are nothing, you are dirt. You are the pounding fist at the end of the night. You are the scum. You hear yourself yell in the background. You don't actually believe this. You are capable of thinking these thoughts and making your heart pound but it's meaningless. 
Other people are meaning. You are special and you are nothing. Just another mote, an I sognficant spider on an insignificant web. You are death and you want life but you keep it at arms reach. You want soul but you are afraid to reach out and grab it. You want to dance and dance and sing and touch and hug and ask questions and absorb and you will feel great until it all comes crashing down. 
It will never all be bliss. You are in it. Life is not fun and life is not fair. It's work, but work comes with strength and life and learning and growing and from all of that comes fun. Fun does not exist in a continuum. You cannot have it without sacrificing your time. Don't have fun for funs sake. Let yourself heal and let your self grow, relax and fall into the moment but don't be afraid to wake.
I think girls likes you because you feel things very strongly and you talked to the quiet ones: you like the cute quiet ones, but it's not about sex. It's about attraction. It's an animal drawing you close. Why is it mostly women? Is it because you find emotional honesty sexy? Have you been using people? Do you use them for their emotional warmth? 
Do you hear yourself? My god, you are fine. You think women are great and wonderful and want to hug them and learn about them. You are mystified by them. You like the sensitive ones. You are a sensitive one. Maybe that what confusing for so many girls. You were a sensitive dreamboat.
Damn you're fine sexy man, gurl. 
You look good in that dress baitch. 
Strut your shit boi. 
Dance at the top of a mountain, live in the bottom of a lake.

You just need to let shit go. Ignore the past, live in the present, prepare tor the future.

You just need to let shit go. Ignore the past, live in the present, prepare tor the future.

Untitled

I don't like being yanked around. If I come to talk with you and the rest of product something and you stay silent, don't pipe up after 20 mins saying the opposite to what we just agreed on, especially when we just ran around telling everyone about what we decided.
If you have an inkling that the incident Ive spent 3 days on is something your familiar with, don't sit there and say nothing. I know you suspected that the incident I worked on was one you were familiar with. That's so rude and wasteful of my time, I have no idea why you think you would make a good leader.
Saying two things after I do all of the leading and talking and organizing is not leading, its being a leech. 
Just because you think you know what the job is like doesn't make you a good leader. You do not do a good job leading, you don't even look in my direction when I say something to you. 
Stop sticking your nose into something just because you think you have the final say. If you aren't involved in something, then stay the fuck out of it. All you do is take the wind out of my sails and deflate whatever energy I had building up. And you make no effort to talk to me about it. 
Just let me have something without shitting all over me and whatever I'm working on, all you do is say don't do this don't do this, thats not leading or helping. Telling people your opinion is not leading and you could give a shit about what i have say which just upsets me even more.
Oh how strange, incidents are piling up and people are complaining I wonder what would have helped get these incidents closed
What the fuck, why am I doing this when Erik is the one on duty. He talks a big talk but doesn't know how to prioritize, just jumping into random services and doing clean up isn't the same thing as doing actual work. He is short sighted a

Future hell - try 2

Wires played across the backlight of the dimly lit room. Shadows crisscrossed over the fresh of a small child, 1 or 2, laying on a steel plank, a few feet off the ground. Tiny glass tubes stuck out of each of the quiet child's digits, one in each finger and one in each toe. The baby stared up I the ceiling, blinking every few minutes and making wordless shapes with his mouth. A spit bubble crept up the corner of his mouth and popped.
The glass tubes ran out of the small cube into a mass of wires and white, matte machinery, quietly pulsing every few seconds. Pump. Pump. Pump. From outside of the cube, the glass tubes vibrate once and red creeps up and out and down into the mass of wires. It travels down and through several rooms and machines, sometimes through plastic bags of different colored liquids and sometimes just shaken up. The glass tubes converge and pass into a steel door adorned with hexagons, overlapping. A steel spider creeps along the edge of the door.
Through the 10 inch door and Through the vacuum sealed clean room, an expanse opens up. The horizon is no where to be seen. Black stretches along the boundaries of the pristine room, it's walls too far to see. The glass pipes run through the see through floor. The only dot of color in the grey and black space.
The tubes enter the bottom of a chair and explilse the blood into the thing sitting on the dias. It takes a breath, shuddering it's weak sac and coughing up spittle. It's eyes blink and adjust to the darkness. It's head hangs low and it's skin drops down over it's floating throne. It twitches with every pulse. Pump. Pump. Pump. It takes another breath. 
Up and through the domed ceiling lies a landscape of impeccable green and lush grass. Perfect manicured, like the boys got done mowing an hour or two ago and are drinking lemonade in the shade. A poplardangles it branches in the wind. A picturesque domicile sits prettily in the exact center of the grass. Little metal bugs crawl and float from flower to foliwer, pollinating and healing. 
Look up and the sky is red. Somewhere out there the sun in crusading down onto the sea and the land, and everything is burned and fire.  I thing lives outside of the dome. Nothing lives inside the done. Life died long ago, the last vestibules of humanity trudge onward.
Only the worst of what we were had perisisted into the eternal hellish dawn. No laughter ring s out and no crying is heard. No planes, no radio signals, no chirping birds. What once made this place livible is now gone.
Wires played across the backlight of the dimly lit room. Shadows crisscrossed over the fresh of a small child, 1 or 2, laying on a steel plank, a few feet off the ground. Tiny glass tubes stuck out of each of the quiet child's digits, one in each finger and one in each toe. The baby stared up I the ceiling, blinking every few minutes and making wordless shapes with his mouth. A spit bubble crept up the corner of his mouth and popped.
The glass tubes ran out of the small cube into a mass of wires and white, matte machinery, quietly pulsing every few seconds. Pump. Pump. Pump. From outside of the cube, the glass tubes vibrate once and red creeps up and out and down into the mass of wires. It travels down and through several rooms and machines, sometimes through plastic bags of different colored liquids and sometimes just shaken up. The glass tubes converge and pass into a steel door adorned with hexagons, overlapping. A steel spider creeps along the edge of the door.
Through the 10 inch door and Through the vacuum sealed clean room, an expanse opens up. The horizon is no where to be seen. Black stretches along the boundaries of the pristine room, it's walls too far to see. The glass pipes run through the see through floor. The only dot of color in the grey and black space.
The tubes enter the bottom of a chair and explilse the blood into the thing sitting on the dias. It takes a breath, shuddering it's weak sac and coughing up spittle. It's eyes blink and adjust to the darkness. It's head hangs low and it's skin drops down over it's floating throne. It twitches with every pulse. Pump. Pump. Pump. It takes another breath. 
Up and through the domed ceiling lies a landscape of impeccable green and lush grass. Perfect manicured, like the boys got done mowing an hour or two ago and are drinking lemonade in the shade. A poplardangles it branches in the wind. A picturesque domicile sits prettily in the exact center of the grass. Little metal bugs crawl and float from flower to foliwer, pollinating and healing. 
Look up and the sky is red. Somewhere out there the sun in crusading down onto the sea and the land, and everything is burned and fire.  I thing lives outside of the dome. Nothing lives inside the done. Life died long ago, the last vestibules of humanity trudge onward.
Only the worst of what we were had perisisted into the eternal hellish dawn. No laughter ring s out and no crying is heard. No planes, no radio signals, no chirping birds. What once made this place livible is. Ow gone.
Time has no meaning anymore. The eternal hellish dawn persists.
The baby in the basement kicks, a glass tube slipping, a trickle of blood drips down. His face crunches and a tear runs down his face. A screen appears, a green ball bounces around the projection. The baby quiets as a small spider approaches and adjusts the tubing back into place and scurries away.
Wires played across the backlight of the dimly lit room. Shadows crisscrossed over the fresh of a small child, 1 or 2, laying on a steel plank, a few feet off the ground. Tiny glass tubes stuck out of each of the quiet child's digits, one in each finger and one in each toe. The baby stared up I the ceiling, blinking every few minutes and making wordless shapes with his mouth. A spit bubble crept up the corner of his mouth and popped.
The glass tubes ran out of the small cube into a mass of wires and white, matte machinery, quietly pulsing every few seconds. Pump. Pump. Pump. From outside of the cube, the glass tubes vibrate once and red creeps up and out and down into the mass of wires. It travels down and through several rooms and machines, sometimes through plastic bags of different colored liquids and sometimes just shaken up. The glass tubes converge and pass into a steel door adorned with hexagons, overlapping. A steel spider creeps along the edge of the door.
Through the 10 inch door and Through the vacuum sealed clean room, an expanse opens up. The horizon is no where to be seen. Black stretches along the boundaries of the pristine room, it's walls too far to see. The glass pipes run through the see through floor. The only dot of color in the grey and black space.
The tubes enter the bottom of a chair and explilse the blood into the thing sitting on the dias. It takes a breath, shuddering it's weak sac and coughing up spittle. It's eyes blink and adjust to the darkness. It's head hangs low and it's skin drops down over it's floating throne. It twitches with every pulse. Pump. Pump. Pump. It takes another breath. 
Up and through the domed ceiling lies a landscape of impeccable green and lush grass. Perfect manicured, like the boys got done mowing an hour or two ago and are drinking lemonade in the shade. A poplardangles it branches in the wind. A picturesque domicile sits prettily in the exact center of the grass. Little metal bugs crawl and float from flower to foliwer, pollinating and healing. 
Look up and the sky is red. Somewhere out there the sun in crusading down onto the sea and the land, and everything is burned and fire.  I thing lives outside of the dome. Nothing lives inside the done. Life died long ago, the last vestibules of humanity trudge onward.
Only the worst of what we were had perisisted into the eternal hellish dawn. No laughter ring s out and no crying is heard. No planes, no radio signals, no chirping birds. What once made this place livible is. Ow gone.
Time has no meaning anymore. The eternal hellish dawn persists.
The baby in the basement kicks, a glass tube slipping, a trickle of blood drips down. His face crunches and a tear runs down his face. A screen appears, a green ball bounces around the projection. The baby quiets as a small spider approaches and adjusts the tubing back into place and scurries away.

Note

Think of games for the team, involving rfid?

Future hell - try 1

Deep pipes and laced wires, crisscrossing over the panels of blue and gold. Blips and beeps scattered over the panel. Blood pumped beat after beat through thin glossy pipes extending from the digits of the child to the rooms beyond. The baby lay on his back with his mouth open, mouthing nothing to the ceiling. Through the walls and open space does the blood pour. It goes up and out, into light and glass and perfect haircuts. It slithers up the side of the building, into the bag of flesh sitting on the throne in the center of an empty room. There is no life outside. I side, there is a dias of gold and a something that was human once. 
It grins to nothing, it's jowls hanging and sloppibg around from the engines keeping hi almost. Brass and steel monsteonsites of all shapes and sizes craw from place to place. The room extended further than the fleshbag could remember. 
The blood enters through pipes in the floor and up through the sacs of vitimans and purifies aster around the base of of the throne. The thing shudders and takes his daily breath and the blood enters him, filling in the gaps left by age and crust and what should be death.
He is nothing, he may not even be a he, it does not know. It knows it won. It knows it survived when everything else around it died and he was the victor. What a victory he won. Armies of steel spiders swoop back and forth, with lugging holes and jumping into pits

Rent a sound proof room to scream in

Rent a sound proof room to scream in

The Uber rich are preparing for the end of the world. The Rick are building their super bunkers and getting transfusions of teenagers blood. They survive, create robots and rule the country.

The Uber rich are preparing for the end of the world. The Rick are building their super bunkers and getting transfusions of teenagers blood. They survive, create robots and rule the country.
That doesn't sound like a good movie, and that's good because it's not. It's the background of a movie. It's our plucky protagonists discover. The horrible secret. All the graves and trash islands discarded. Wrecked earth and sunken decay. 97% of the rest of the population starved. The remaining 2% {2 is too close to 1} were from the Midwest where they didn't starve and their natural habitat (away from the coasts, maybe there are more who knows. Anyway these trash people keep living their lives.
They have built neighborhood out of junk and trash and have the same day to day issues that we have.m, sitcom style. They prance and laugh and cry and cry. 
The uberrich keep kids around to transfusing their blood.
Kids as YA material.
Action movie. (Escaping the dome and getting outside. Audience doesn't get to see what it looks life

Notes for therapy

Deductible?

My challenges


Note

It bothers me that I am so contrived sometimes, especially when around friends, and I am unable to get a word in. Later I hear the same friends laughing really hard at something and I worry that I can't do that to them. I think I'm really funny, I just get so caught up when listening in a group that I can't get a word in.

Mental health app - Cassidy

Mental health app - Cassidy

Note

Rule 1: you could die at any moment.
Rule 2: Ask someone a question and listen to their answers.

Be public about you, Drew, Cassidy hanging out. Go get lunch with all of your coworkers. Don't just imagine plans for a better future, for you and the people around you. Work towards it. Brighten everyone's day, ask them a question they've never been aske

Be public about you, Drew, Cassidy hanging out. Go get lunch with all of your coworkers. Don't just imagine plans for a better future, for you and the people around you. Work towards it. Brighten everyone's day, ask them a question they've never been asked. You like people, I think you love people. Other people get you going, you don't like being alone, you get sloppy. Talk to someone new today and ask them their names. Get to know people. Met everyone. Again, look them in their eyes. Don't just crawl back to your hole. Go out and wander and find someone to talk to who you know. Go talk to that intense girl, she seems cool but icy. Mildly unnerving. Go talk with former managers. Stop dudes in the hallway. Women especially, but there's a lot more men than women. May have to get back to man mode for a bit. You've been living in feminine land, and have traveled the great seas. You are far more comfortable with yourself than you ever have been. This is all a story, to help you to do new things. Meet people. Talk to someone at the bar. Everything scares you. Travel back to man land for a bit. Bask in that high chair. Be aware of it at all times. Know who you are, not the version you've made from round and round thoughts, read other people opinions about the world. Be aware of all the benefits the world has given to you and try to talk to everyone you possibly can with before you die. Be embarrassing, have a hard time, stumble, have a quick tiny conversation. People don't know this is your norm. 

It's all in your head.

It's all in your head, it's the summer fantastic, the remix. You imagine scenes and you watch them play out of other people's perverted perceptions and just because that's how you've always done things, doesn't mean it's the only path. Go have a hard conversation, you'll feel better. You say that you are a talker, that you get down deep, but you don't. You aren't there, you are in the shallow version in your own head. Those pictures are lies. Your emotions are real. Your body keeps moving ahead.

I have a particular fondness for jrpgs

Eye question mark
Play an rpg, play a board game. 
Call grandma kay, other grandparents later. Create set amounts of people to talk to

Do people think I am mean or rude? Or scared all of the time?

Do people think I am mean or rude? Or scared all of the time?

Note

350
125
50
Bodyshop

Fear is supposed to be practicEd not

Fear shouldn't be suppressed, it should be practiceD

Assume you know nothing about what someone means. You don't get subtext. Especially when it makes you feel bad. Maybe you didn't understand. Ask them if you don't understand. You hear things wrong sometimes. All the time. The product talks about miscommu…

Just listen instead of talking and ask questions. One question to someone as possible. Once a day.

Westside Detail - Ray


Goals

reduce spending
take the train 
fix career
learn to toichtype
learn digital elecdtronics
be a better person get closer to my north star
Mental:
ASD
Social phobie
cognitive dissonance
neurotic
get out of head
talk to family more
see if people are or actually makes dates
concrete short term dthings:
tomorrow: walk to the store, do marie kondo.
dentist, teeth in general
heart beating too quickly?

Ask Drew what he would imagine SIM would look like if done differently

People need to be taught how to be developers, not assumed to already be them. Be an example of what they could do and bring them up with you. Teach people how to learn and what to read and how to makie change and how to convince and what should be prioritized and the best ways to do something and learn and figure out what takes the most amount of time.
Just need to become a leader, not wait for it to be given.
You are a strong source of data to product

Note

Play games by yourself on Friday. Release the golden sun that you know is tucked inside. Find peace in this horrible earth. Become in the moment. Treat yourself well and treat you like a good friend. Take care of you, you are all you have in the end. You and everyone else you love, your being imprinted onto them. Shine, shine, shine. Make yourself a priority when you wake up.
I don't have 8 hours of programming a day in me

Untitled

i jut am going to write. i cam so this if i xan just ftrre op my mind 

Untitled

I don't know if I'm being crazy ore what but I have this feeling like I've found out something new. It hits me a lot hen I am high. IT carries me and saves me in the moment, but that moment doesn't always come back. I am lost inside my head. What I found were memories. What you used to do. Have you grown up and are living by someone else's standard, reading articles to shore up any holes. You love being on the fucking computer, why aren't you doing this more. This is what you like to do. This has meaning and makes your heart race. Why is watching TV any better? You can do so much on here, you just need you let yourself go. Is this not fun anymore? Checking social media and just hanging out? Are you lost and not yet found. There is a symptom thats the things that used to give you joy do not. Maybe you have crept up from the crevace? This is you and this is life. Mindfullness is only one thing at a time, and I can (n't) do that. What does 1 at a time mean how does that apply to my computer? Is a task one open tab, and is social media distracting? You can focus on general internet time, which is where you are allowed to do those things. You used to be on social media all the time, you actually love that shit. It's a performance, it's shitting your brand all over the world, it's being axcctive and fun. It's learning how to write music and playing some new game. Food needs to be good and body needs to be working well, and then it's okay. Games are fine. Being with people is better but that's not always the case. Be friends with strangers on the internet. What seperates you from the other people from XOXO? You don't match right now because you are not here. This is your space. You can have some of this space. Internet is creatiom and internet is peace. Fuck hiding my data from the world, you can have it. Treasure it in your banks. See my brand all over you space, collecting in dark cupboards. See the family, see the videos, go on facebook and catch up with people. You know it's a face but you don't care. You know now how to not let it depress you. Hide all the political people, and you have friends and family just shitting around. Maybe log onto instagram? Become a social media queen. Overlap and overload, I can't wait until I learn how to type correctly.

Note

I don't know anything about the intuitive work you do, so this question comes from a place of ignorance. I was reading in the HSP book you gave me that HSPs (which I 100% am) generally have an unconcious, intuitive sense about things, due to how much extra stuff is being processed. Does that have anything to do with the work you do? I know vaguely that you do excersizes to unfold the unconscious part of your mind

Don't forget this feeling, this softness. The wholeness. Have an actual day of self care. Today you masterbated instead of watching porn. You trusted your body and took care of it. You trimmed it's hair, brushed it's teeth, and flossed it's mouth. You was

Don't forget this feeling, this softness. The wholeness. Have an actual day of self care. Today you masterbated instead of watching porn. You trusted your body and took care of it. You trimmed it's hair, brushed it's teeth, and flossed it's mouth. You washed and moaturiozed it. You made it feel welcome. You held it and you caressed it. You became a part of it.
Take an actual day of self care. Get rid of stuff/put stuff in current positions throughout next 3 days. Clothes tomorrow. Just one spot, just one thing. Wake up in a clean room, shuffle the robe on, drink a coffee. Go somewhere new for brunch. Walk there. Visit friends over lunch. Work on a project during the afternoon. Get fresh ingredients and make dinner and drink wine, and just eat it without the TV on. Read a book, eat dessert. Luxuriate. Fuck. Lotion. Shave. Cuddle. Face. Teeth. Sleep.

What is the point of all this struggle if not for culture?

What else is there? It's the end. Make all equal, give all people rights, so we can live and learn and be entertained and fall into a deep slumber.

Include family relations in dossier

Include family relations in dossier
How to make dossier? CLI, data stored encrypted and saved up to S3
Nice print out of info
Needs to be a fancy, full screen cli, not just print lines

Note

Victor vran
Monster hunter world

Dad code

4282

Note


Note

I feel like a man shell filled with another liquid. It's pinker, swirilonged around by current cultures. The band of man in right, and if it were to grow in height I could be apart of it, but for now I am holding myself down in non binary. It not for anyone else, it's for you. Maybe it's just a label. Maybe it's truth. Maybe it's a mental fortress. It's my holdout until the crowd loosens up. 

Note

I am judging my own mind. Or are you masterbating again? You tell your thoughts no. Stop riding the wave and describe the shape as best as you can. Or go with the flow and type out quite flight. Live with no regrets. Stop obsessing and stop feeling guilty. Go fight it off and condescend. This is you, this is the best you that you can get now, stop fighting it. Dump that shit out. Do you apologize and lie and constantly judge? Just be and accept you can't be 

Do helen and I both dislike masculine men? Is that just me? It bothers you. You are against them. You love the nice ones and ignore the rest.

Do helen and I both dislike masculine men? Is that just me? It bothers you. You are against them. You love the nice ones and ignore the rest. 
It's just an older brother thing. Do you still see them as less? Just children underneath all of that dress? Just pierces of clay on the wall. That are hole but you are one. They are the spring and you are the fall. They are nothing but you are fine. Stop leaving thing out just go out the door. Cut this later you little seen, bitching and bitching and can't be be heard. Just bitching and bitching and being a fool. You did it though, you didn't need to blame them. 
Ca you leave Browning's out all night? 
Things seem to bump and things seem to rhyme. Thing are just two and you are just five. Six has a dick and floats down the nice. You are black you are white you are the bunblijgs of a tool. You are sin you are hate not everything has to be perfect you know the rhymes are in the tip and you are in control. You are the man and I am the rage and then devil and the prose and the wonderment and. not the whole hell
You are rambling and you are in rage, you are the right and not quite right, I am stuck in this rhyme, it's shabby it's poor and basic and store but I can't get out and see what is out there.
You are masterbation and you are filth. You are depression and hated and bush and filth. 
Do you actually believe that? Have you stuck down that low? Were you fine a minute ago. Emotions come out and emotions will blow. You are here you are there you are anywhere too.
The rightness will fade and the righteous will rage and the pope will go home and went out the lab, you are the quarter
We all struggle and we are all down but we can prop each other up. You are a filter on though that you can't lay downs, is there only one are raw thoughts worth pessessiong, and the can't quite die I am lost and in fry

Home is nice

Home is nice and comforting. You can feel your chest relax and your abdomen fletch. You are roaring water, searing around. You are distracted. You are happy. You're depressed. You are feeling like a teenager, or as you all know, some weekends sometimes. 
You are rushing head and melted body. You are stoner high and ready for a party.
You read a headline and knew you felt bad for it, it's secretly melting you down, and then you turn to your brother and make a joke.
Everything quiets down, or at least it doesnt register.
I need to learn how to be high so I can just write this shit down. I can't write in all this noise. Break my heart and hope to die, I'm writing this when I'm high.
Please take me home and leave me there

Okay buddy

Your mom knows you are going to write a book someday. It maybe sort of sucks to admit it, but you are smart. Tyler, someone who sort of was annoying but you respect a lot as an engineer, thinks your brilliant. You are a code god, according to some. You got like 98% and 99% on all your tests my dude. You were put in the one class with other smart people, but who the fuck knows what they got on the scores. Are you good at tests? Are you maybe pretty intelligent? Intelligent is one thing, morality and brain stuff is other. Learning quickly and being able to solve problems vs having good relationships is different. Everyone who's ever met you had loved you, says Dallas. I imagine he's crying but he's not, but it's dark in the car and you can't see his eyes. Your brain is a truck dump of flame fluid, a cannoster of oil with a hole in the side. I'll come up with better metaphors later. Multiple professors complimented me on my writing. That one guy was obsessed with you. You are good at the things you do. You don't get all the credit, but you did help in the end. Results are different that good thoughts. Well contextualized thoughts. The world doesn't work that way. A lot of the people you talked to at XOXO we're smart. Cassidy is smart and driven as hell. I don't need to rank peoples intelligence. Maybe there are other traits I should look at? Dallas is caring and sweet, kind of rude but he's chilled the fuck out since he started smoking weird. Maybe ask him more about what it felt like before vs now: Alex is empathetic and website, but more a free floating flower vs a metaphor I can't think of yet.
You should write a zine: wtf is it going to be about. Is it shitty to just blast your thoughts down on a page? It seems gross. Maybe people confuse ADHD with smart. You are articulate, so what. Your differently wired brain givens you strengths and weaknesses than everyone, and you are missing in many areas other succeed in. Being brave. Being outgoing. Ignoring that thawing in your brain. Being responsible and not impulsive with money. So many things I lack, but you make it up in other areas. I am good at areas of problem solving and recalling facts. That what the ADHD brain is described as. There's got to be something else, is IQ an actual thing? What makes you smart be dumb? Someone can be nice and caring but not the quickest learner. Maybe don't get mad at someone who keeps forgetting to do things. Remind them again and again. What if they just don't want to do the thing, maybe they think that thing is immoral. Your opinions are not the end al of the universe, you are a tiny fleck amount giants. The giants aren't people; those are the billions of years that the universe (as far as we know) sat empty and slow and the Earth grew up. Are there any other reasons for any of this? Are our brains grow from chance, or do they reflect the u inverse around them? They are part of a giant stack, a head on the pimple of the universe. Everything is wrapped around it: the animals. The trees. Protons. Neuranium, Stars, dark matter, empty space, alpha centari. How long have you sat around thinking you are dumb when you are fine. Proving you are smart and know things to the world is a waste of time. Don't convince others of what you think or make them do what you want. Are they ever okay? Do they understand what you understand? We all see things differently; and not just moving the shapes around but they all still sorta sit. Everyone you have ever met has loved you. Pay attention and learn about the people around you. It's what you want to do. You start it with asking questions instead of expected to be asked questions, although it is nice because that's what you want to do with other people. Listen and actually dig into what they are talking about. Point and hold when you have to. Dark helps you write because you can't see anything, just the pale screen of the iphone, white and grey, little buttons on it. There is nothing else so you look at your phone instead of whatever was trying to escapee before. Let's come back to it. This is what you were made to do, you were made to write. Nothing else empties you out and fills you up like writing. It's the resealed drain on your soul. You feel your heart pump faster and you whole body is clenching and doesn't care if it hurts. Some of this is the week. It is a super dump but it makes you feel good.
It doesn't matter if I am smart or not. The whole point is that I is not the whole. There's a whole world around you that you want to appreciate. You don't like always being an introvert, you want to dig into other people. Is socializing taxing for you? Honestly no, when you are releasing your redivide. You love spending time with people but you aren't amazing at spending as much time studying and writing about them. About all the sit around you. You want to stare the world in the face instead of holding it inside of you.
Yes; yes, very smart indeed
You are just a master; master, thank you for gracing us with your presence. You are actually extremely lucky. You have good facial bone structure that people appreciate and and you have a lot of General smarts.

Stuff

Confirm NYE plans
Start a start up
Play the game in order to change the system. Use that dynamo inside of you that comes out when you are happy and excited about something.
 Write if you are feeling bad.
Current values: Leisure, knowledge, and friendship/family (still unsure about the last)
I feel like our love of leisure is what ties Helen and I together. I hope she will change with me. She's already farther down embracing health than I am
New values: Health, 
Play the game to change the system
Go and do the things I was meant for
What burns deep inside? There's always games, but games really isn't it. Leisure for no purpose serves nothing. Games preform all sorts of functions, and it's those functions that are important. Bringing people together (board games, rpgs), sharing values/teaching lessons/representing something/fighting power (art), a release/a private world to play in (recharge your batteries because rl is hell). Helping people stay afloat. 
If I were to start a company, what things would be important to me?
Things to hope for:
Something that elevates work from marginalized groups.
Something that helps the homeless in Portland.
I need to use Nike instead of Nike using me. That includes how I spend my earnings
Social anxiety is literally assuming the worst in people
I want to live like there is no tomorrow, as cliche as that is. Fuck patterns and fuck non-existence. Let me exist instead of fearing not. Ask the questions I want to ask, the ones that have stayed lodged in my skull. Free them.
Casey: What the fuck happened? I'm sorry for throwing everything away. For all the time we spent together, I wasn't that amazing of a friend. You could be difficult and could make things awkward, but you also didn't have the fear that I did and I latched onto your drive and it propelled me forward. We also had some amazing times together.
Adam: What the fuck happened? I felt like you threw me away. I remember you hearing from Ericka about us moving to Portland and I didn't want you to learn that way. I had given my notice but I wanted to talk to you about when I was ready. Obvs Ericka didn't know it was not public info yet. I miss you and I think of you every time I watch Adventure Time. Helen and I watched the whole show (After years of prodding, Helen has finally accepted that she likes animated stuff, Her favorites are Kill la Kill (yeah that's right), Steven Universe, and that one Disney XD twin peaks-y show, and Adventure Time. Also FMA:B, of course) and I sobbed after the finale. I am assuming you've finished it, otherwise this is going to be awkward. I wasn't mentally prepared for the finale. The last couple seasons went so fast I didn't realize this was the end until PB and Marcaline smooched. The thesis of the show, it being about music, wrecked me. I was a little high, which makes me more vulnerable to emotions, but it was so lovely and made so much sense, it colored my perception of the show and I cannot believe that they managed to slip that in under the radar. This was the first time I've cried in awhile. I started with the finale, moved to all the pent up sad from Trump et al and finished with realizing the path for my life that was ingrained (good job, house, kids, inviting family over for Christmas, etc) wasn't going to happen and everything I had once thought was thrown into disarray since Trump was elected. I'm aware of so much more shit. Our privileged, how fucking lucky I am, how feeling guilty about all of that serves no one but yourself. I've been trying to come up with a description for my new IG account, and it's basically “Non-binary, feminist, software guy, cat dad, asshole”.
Anyway. If you want to write back, that's cool. If you don't, that's cool too. I thought for so long that the past should stay dead, and I am sending this letter to clear out my own head of questions and dissipointments.
PS: I got Jon (and by extension Donald) jobs on my team at Nike. Jon got converted to full-time while Donald is still a contractor (he started way later than Jon). And we've been playing Arkham Horror LCG w/ Janes as well, which has been amazing. They were a bright spot in dark times for awhile.
PPS: Tell Kat hello for me, I didn't check social media but I assume you are still together. Helen still holds a firey grudge against her that will never die. I hope she's doing well. I started using a MacBook at work and now I'm addicted, fuck windows forver, long live Linux (and by extension macs)
Love,
Chris Kriech
Ashley: you pop up in my mind once awhile. I didn't react to you saying you had a pregnancy scare, and that was a big fuckup. I think I remember when it happened. We were at my house in Sioux City making out, rubbing our junk together, and things were heavy. I was pressing up against the door and I asked you in heavy breaths if you wanted me to keep going. I was lust-blind. I heard you say yes and I entered and finished when I didn't mean to. Knowing what I know now, I should of at least pulled our, but I didn't. I was ignorant and unaware of what I had done to you. I'm sorry. If you had gotten pregnant, it would have been 100% my fault, even though I would not have seen it that way then.
PS: I was diagnosed with relitivekt severe Auditiry Processing Disorder, with the area I am very deficient in is Auditiry Cloze, or the ability for the brain to fill in sound with context. It comes up a lot as me starting arguments because I disagree with the simplist, direct meaning of what someone has said, rather than the intention behind it. This is what I blame on hearing you say yes, when I can only assume that you didn't. I wish we had talked about this sooner. 
Emily: We had great times and I regret none of it. You were my most stable teenage romantic relationship and I am glad you ended it when you did. 
Church growing up taught me to keep my shit tied down and to not think about it. Thinking is not sin, questioning is not sin. I don't care what Calvary has to say. We all worship and live in our own ways, none of it aligned perfectly with some doctrine.
Ask Alex about Amy
Talk to dad about big work weekend, that shit is cool
People from North High I would look up:
Sam, Matt, Max, Shelby maybe, not Ellie ever, Casey. Probably too late at this point, but in May for sure.
Wtf is up with airplane mode
Would it be better or worse for me to allow the random google searches?
I don't think I have Autism, but I want to talk to my mom about it

App that gives info about number of homeless in city and types of support that is available

But in a way that's presented to the City and also helpful for people who need help.
Go and interview the homeless in the city

Titles

Queen Helen, duchess of Kitties, princess of tigers, first of her name

Love is trusting people

Healthy love is trust and thinking the best out of the people. Don't expect them to fail you. Just keep learning and trusting in these people. That is what you would want somebody else to do, you wouldn't want them to sit around and worry about things you had done, because you are pretty straightforward with your friends. Drew could worry about not asking the right questions.
 Okay that one may be legit. That was a big deal for you, you wanted to talk about it a little. That was a big moment. Is that an expectation you would have? What would you do for someone else? I'd be sincere and thank them for telling you, especially if they have anxiety. That's what they need. It's not encouraging bad behavior and it helps them dea. It's helping, it's not harming. Being open and straightforward for someone with anxiety is fine, you don't have to treat them the same way as everyone else. Is that the case though? You wouldn't want to be a pitier, more like trusting. Does it encourage them to keep with the behavior, like their worry is encouraged by your giving in and releasing a part of the energy you have in the day to them? Do you want everyone working for themselves or everyone else.
 What is your expectation of other people's behavior? Do you tell them when you think they didn't something wrong, or only if it was against someone else? Is being the better person being brave or being scared? 
You are pounding and perfect and I am hell on earth. I and wind and I am fire and I am pleasure and anger and rage and hate and lying, stabbing, shooting, angry death at your door. I am the mild high before the end. I am the joy and I am the devil. I am sin, I am glutiny and I am sex. I am pleasure. I am what you were taught to do without. It's ingrained in you that spending time playing games is a waste of time. It's written because you think about it all the time. It's not the thoughts, it's the road they traveled in on. It's the what of what you were thinking about, not the why. It's the question, it's not the answer. It's the margin, not the note. Not the quick srawl across the page, but the meaning behind the arm. It's the way traveled, not the rising and falling of the waters. It's the hevean, not the hell. It's the broth, not the death. Death is here, death is real, death is. Death is loss and death is real. It's dark painting and dark love. Smears smears smears, it's the bite of the hand. Is it the thoughts that come before or the thoughts that come after?
In summary: (you would end the priece before this, this is just for you):
You think about morality a lot. Leaisure isn't something you value, deep down. You know it's waste, or at least you think it. You try to run against it and try to chnage it but it always comes back. I don't know if you are inflexible or pushing the wrong way, and that's okay. Maybe ask some friends what they feel about this stuff, he had some great fucking advice.
Express yourself, express yourself, express yourself.
Writing is love, writing is sharing, writing is pulling out crud, writing is dumping your thoughts down onto a page. It's a reflection of an author, and you like reading. Why wouldn't people want to read you? There are plenty of white male writers, but that's okay. You can't chnage that. You can use your privilege to pull people up past you rather than imaging your always looking down. Not everyone may like your writing, and that's fine. Maybe there are people who think similarly to me. Maybe I would like those people, people who shared the same values but we're there own true individual. Maybe the people close to you would read it and appreciate it too. Maybe it would scare them, maybe it would make them bleed. Or laugh. Or cry. Maybe it doesn't matter what it is, maybe it just matters that it was. And that the reaction had happen.

Olfacetetic

Olfactory kinesis 

What would be worth creating an organization for at work?

Gender and racial bias training
More focus on hiring and better pool of candidates
Innovation time and basic engineer positive practices
Focus on new technology instead of absurdly stringent requirements
Focus on basic service infrastructure and simplifying deployments and founding better solution for some of our clunky shit

Note


My brain is fragile but I am not

My brain breaks down and tells me horrible secrets. It's the demon on my shoulder, it's the shadow of a man in my pocket. It's a lengthy ghost. It's terror, it's shaking, it's quaking, it sends these signals reverberating down my spine. It tells my heart to race and my brow to sweat. 
I am not my brain. Thoughts are translucent and temporary. Emotions are temporary. I've read a couple whole articles on Mindfulbess and I am now an expert. Life is suffering, life is the pursuit of leisure, life is pain, life is fine, just okay, maybe.
I am not my thoughts. I am not the tumbleweeds pushing past my eyes or the knowledge of the thoughts in the heads around me. I'm not the hate and I'm not the love. I am set, center, whole, supposedly defenseless against the dark things crawling around. I have a wound that will not heal, pussing, sputtering. I am not the death that calls to me, I am it who waits for death.
Death is coming, death is here. My thoughts in this given moment are temporary are meaningless.a

I want to throw parties

Dance parties, fancy dress parties, local multiplayer parties, gender swap parties, spooky parties, Dungeon world parties, board game parties, smash parties, drunk parties, high parties, sober parties, cool parties, bad parties
Actual ideas: my birthday

What a fucking week

The agenda today
I went from zero to talking about being non-binary with Cassidy. She's a role-model, talking to her is like extracting wisdom from a only-slightly-older-than-you-but-much-more-mature-tree. She's lovely. Drew, Jenna, and I locked in our shit this weekend. We're some of each others' favorite people. 

Note

Jon Donald James. Drew Jenna (Sam by proxy at this point, everyone loves him, I still really haven't had a conversation with him) Cassidy. Work people can be mixed up for workish related things. Work is not the same as social life, we have things outside of it.
Mixing groups is in poor taste. Spend time with JJD and JDSC at separate occasions. They come from different sources, even if they all mix up. Refrain from badmouthing co-workers, unless you 100% trust the people you are with and are already having a bitch sesh. It helps to talk about shit. 
Being honest is not always the highest priority. Truth is subjective and memories are faulty. If you are desperate to tell someone something, make sure it's something that would affect them in a positive way. If not, check and see if you are doing it to make yourself feel better only.
Death is on its way, death is here.

Anxiety

Dec 14th, 2018: Made a joke that I thought Cassidy took as me asking for a ride but she started to leave like I hadn't asked: Heartbeat increased, flushed face, cone-like vision

Power Dynamics

It's not that people didn't get my impassioned plea, it's that the concept of different power dynamics is completely missing when you are in power (i.e. like me). It's not even that important in the long run and there are much more important power struggles in the world. I just wish they would not rush to defend themselves. 
Saying product will win in a decision against engineering got some groans (or at least the eqiuibilent). No one wants to hear that, that's what leaders talk about in their time, in a room with the door closed, people don't say it out loud. I guess I don't have the finesse to know when to keep my mouth shut when I get worked up.

Mindy mays markey

Mindy mays markey

I cried a lot today. I don't know if I've ever typed that before

A lot of thins crshed down today. We were finishing Adventure Time (I had no idea we made to the finale already, I was not mentally preapred at all). Something in the last scene hit me, the show being abot music was a fucking magic moment. My face was already wet and streaming but that scene let some shit out of me. It poured out all ovr Helen. It started with OOO, and it was crying but it finishd quickly. I told Helen I didn't know what I was crying about. She was proping me up and hugging me.
2 years was soething I said yesterday. I had only been freaking out at home since around 2 years ago. What there an event 2 years ago, perhaps-My therapist said to (who I realized today has a similar haircut to my mom) me (I'm engradizing a bit) that you can recall when this started?
I remembered watching the episode of Orange is the New Black (obvs spoilers) that (my god I cant believe I can't remeber her or the actors name) she died, being crushed by the nice, young gaurd. That scene tore me up in way I hadn't happened before. It seemed real. I couldn't sleep because I was obsessing over death and emptiness and nn-existance. I was like that for week. Maybe it was the dream that I died is what happened and the show spun it out of me.
While Helen holding me and I was feeling the aftershocks of the cry. Something still bit at the back of my mind. The horizon was still tight, pulling straight across my vision. I starting sobbing again, harder. I remember reading recently on a headline that it had been 2 years since Trump was elected. Negative energy flowed out of me as I grapsed against my wife and released a river onto her robe. It's not just Trump and that we all know now how the world really works and we hd been lied to our whole live about the real truths and all of this was here before, it just didn't affect me. I was fine and only thinking bout my own shit. The world was fine and it was going to be fine and I was going to grow old, get a house first, have a family and raise kids. It's been imprinted onto me by my family, that's what all the men do. Get job (the wives get jobs too, but I'm thinking about Josh and Dad and Mike and the thick scratched up wedding ring, a little stretchy skin hanging off it bulbusly.
That was it, school, get a job making games, have fun and didn't worry about shit. I did worry but those things I worried about were nothing. I tell my self (from that one scifi book) and your emotions are relative to your current sitattion. There are rich people worrying about billions of dollar as the contemplate how to bask in it forever. Children are being ripped from their parents arms and forced to sleep in concentration camps (too much?). I put off my FAFSA eveyr year up to the last moment. I even imagined one year a grey ball up and to the right, out of my sight. I pushed all of my problems into their and kept on going.
Holy shit
Things make a lot more sense.
Everythig is temporary, including your emotons and memories and existance. We are fleeting moments, yes t cliche but it's also true. Sometimes daramtic truism have purpose. We may make fun of them but a good qote picks usup and dusts us off. I've been reading about death a lot, so I have to say these things.
Everything is temporary and every moment is another step to the grave. On the other hand, I will also live forever, growing old into eternity and never seeing the tunnel. I'll let it spring on me, but I'll go with it gently. Grasp its hand and head forward into the beyond.

People to get to know


Values

Family
Knowledge
Leisure
Does my therapist think that I spend more energy than normal people on tasks

cannabis

Your eyes give you sight, your mind gives you vision. For you, these two words are exactly the same. Sight and vision. Two words that mean the same thing. I thought that I made this up, I still haven't checked to see if I accidentally stole someone else's quote. I gave it to the the teacher on for a project where we cane up a slogan or affirmation or something. I remember her asking if I came up with it. You've gotten random compliments from people before on the things you have written. Your English professor read your piece out loud in front of the class. That one guy who puked on your floor was obsessed with you. Your psychology professor complimented your essay when everything else you gave him was average (he didn't say that last part). These were all significant moments that you let just slide by. They buzzed right out of your mind, onto the next thing. On the social day of XOXO you went to as many as you could. No one else you talked to did the same things. They hung out and got used to each other and learned information about each other. They met new people and looked at there faces and eyes and touched hands. Are you broken or are you wrong? Are you neither? You are neither, don't let the dramatic sentiment get the better of you. You are the finalities in thought you have while your high. Your thoughts are fragile and listless. They try really hard but they aren't right all the time. Constantly assuming you are wrong isn't the perfect solution. Is doing something a different way still making the same decision? Two different paths are still paths. Do the little things that people do matter? Your mind wants to say yes but you also know that's wrong. Little things do matter. Your touches, your caresses, your smiles and hugs and notes and drunken backslapping, they are important, every bit is important. All of this is temporary and forever. 

Anxieties

I didn't used to be like this, afraid of death and the thoughts that come with it. Things are dark now where they weren't before. I know this logically but the realization is still strong. I wasn't always like this. I was different, I am different, I can be different.
A lot of it is around wasting time. Like you spend your whole Sunday gaming and now you feel sick, like you did something you wish you didn't that you can't take back. Your chest is tight and it builds up again and again. Hanging out all day was the old pattern, the pattern you don't want to continue. But do you? Can you go out and do things everyday? I imagine being exhausted. I really don't move all that much through the day. I go to the same safe places and everything else frightens me. I've always been a little frightened, but it didn't live with me at home. Home was the safe place. The strategies I used before, like gaming all day and watching TV don't work anymore. Maybe they weren't strategies, only habits. 
My old habits don't work. Do I play games or not play games? If you leave it up to me, I'll play all day and night. So what's correct? Is playing games wrong? Is the time I spend debating a waste of my limited time? Does playing games no longer line up with your values? Playing games all day at least. Every day after work playing games and sitting and waiting for the world to end.
Maybe you can do more than you think you can. don't trust your brain, trust your gut. Don't always trust Helens opinions about when or when not to do things. She is perfect, but she is a cat.

Rules - Productivity/General


Social - General


Finances

Ahhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhgghhgggh

Career

AHHhHhHhHhHhHhHhHhH
Short term plans:
Medium term:

Relationships - Family

Regular contact minimum: Literally anything at least every two weeks
Important to keep regular contact:
Alex, Mom, Dad, Dallas, Emily, Julie
Once and awhile:
Grandpa and Grandma Kriech, Grandma Kay. 
Wtf to do with:
Charlie

Relationships - Networking

Kill me

Relationships - Friends

Friendships to maintain:
James, Jon, maybe Donald, Drew, Jenna
Positivity, Consistency, and Vulnerability
Drew
Jon
James
Jenna:

Where I put Shit

Travel case for switch: Black kallex in indent, 2nd to the bottom drawer

Tsk to drew and jenna about how long it took to write notes. Make a pile of everything we don't need and throw it out (a soulful bonded item can stay). Find out how to organize cords

Tsk to drew and jenna about how long it took to write notes. Make a pile of everything we don't need and throw it out (a soulful bonded item can stay). Find out how to organize cords

Note


You like working with other people


Games I Want To Play

Red Dead Redemption 2
Divinity: Original Sin 2
MGS V
The World Ends Woth You - Switch
Lotr lcg digital 

People suck/Smile more.

I have to release the relentless enthusiasm that I keep locked up. Even saying it my head I sound droll. I know what it was like and it's still there, it's a bright smile tugging at your lips. It's energizing people and just being nice. Saying you will be in a spot all day so people can come to you, release the smiles that are there sometimes. 
Maybe enthusiasm to you is emotional so you keep it locked up. I remember when you used to laugh and smile, that was before trump, before I was aware of how true oh awful the world can be, it's a dark and shitty place and we barely make keep our buildings put, listless and falling apart. Sheets of plastic stacks over and over each other. No consensus on climate change, all the insects are dead, death is next to you at all time. 
Maybe you could live like death will be here tomorrow. What would that look like? That would be jumping out of bed and going to a coffee shop, having a nice smile, plugging in your fun laptop and learning impact.js. That example is a little specific. Be before taking the train to work and walking that extra 20 minutes.
People suck, the world sucks, it's always sucked. For most other people. You have had it bad and a lot of the world has it much worse.
What are you?non binrary queer adjacent most straight, does that even count anymore? Your closest friends you are constantly embarrassed of and a couple people who are so dear to you that it makes you uncomfortable. You really like them. You feel strong feelings for a limited amount of people. You can't don't sp always shine it everywhere. People may see into your bliss but you only receive it from a select few.
You are a monster,  goblin, playing computer games all day. With your rogue likes and your love craft bullshit. You are the terror that lives inside of you and ceeeps up your chest and stops your heart. You are. Doll and as foolish person and I hate you.
You played vide
Man ducking it I went a little too far.
Listen buddy. You have a deep dark shadow but that's not all of you. People scare you, eye contact scares you, the world will keep shitting and shitting and shitting and you have to  bare the least of it with a grin. Serious times are here always but you can't let that drag you down, because then what would be the point of anything. And. Edndless steuggle for head and food and the quiet silence of qu of death. 
I have nothing left, I landed on the wrong side of the  fence but I'll talk to myself before bed and make sure we are okay. 
You will smile tomorrow to the first people you see besides you wife (but also her)
Smile at them but for you.

ADHD

Confirmed: APD
ADHD 
Hypersensitivity 
Rejection Sensitivity dysphoria
One long depressive period in college started after getting yelled at for poaching people from another groups event while I was a CA. I didn't realize at the time that we were seen as poaching, I was hanging out at the other event
ASD?
Social Anxiety Disorder?
including not looking people in the eyes

Death, my kitties, and myself

When I'm thinking about death, I'm not thinking about what's going to happen to me, I've thinking about the people I'm going to leave behind
--Helen Kriech
Helen's apathy torwards faith may affect how she views death, or at least she supposes. She seems flatter about the subject, there isn't that deep inside pounding terror that comes with thinking about death or the afterlife. I've always thought about afterlife or about the emptyness that's maybe waiting. Helen isn't worried about that. She doesn't think about herself, she thinks about those she's going to leave behind. 
What does that say about me? Since I've been reading and thinking about death, the general topic doesn't fuck me up as much. I had a dream where I died and I had trouble sleeping for weeks. I guess that's what people mean. My brain was wired and spinning and my chest was pounding, the nighttime room reminded me of what lay in store. That's cliche, but whatever. 
I hope my kitties are having the best lives they can. Maybe I should be nicer. They will die (probably) far earlier than I will. I love my babies. People didn't seem to understand why Helen and I left our honeymoon a day early because Kitty ran away from Helen's parents house. My baby had never run away before, we have always lived in apartment buildings and she does not go outside. She's obbessed with it but gets to breathe that fresh green air only once or twice a year.
Helen started balling while listening to the voicemail from her dad. He sounded so even about it. No one told us to our faces that we were being dramatic, but I get it. Even right now my critic is telling me, always in the voice of an older adult man (sometimes Helens father) about how rediculous it is that we got so upset. The better version would be that we got the voicemail, told each other it would be fine and we should get on with our day and finish the trip.
What does it mean that Helen thinks about other people before herself? Is that what that literally means? It feels like an alien concept sometime, I'm so wrapped up in thinking about what people thinking about me I don't always get a chance to know how they feel. I have rare conversations that hold my attention like the ones Heen and I have been having. We know the depths and deep curves of each other's souls and she can read my carvings and loves it entirely, just as she loves our kitties, her family, makeup, going to beauty school, my brother.
I get caught up in my own head often and it sucks the life out of me. I never reget thinking about other people even though I forget often. I'm left with a heavy open feeling in my chest and the wind blowing through my head. Peacefullness flowing through my veins. 

Songs to learn

We'd never agree - PS Elliot
Lapis Lazuli - Steven Universe
With you - Waxahatchee

Random todo


You cannot just do whatever your latest thoughts want to do at any given moment. Your brain is fallable and your is especially taken over by your amygdala. Marshmallows

You cannot just do whatever your latest thoughts want to do at any given moment. Your brain is fallable and your is especially taken over by your amygdala. Marshmallows

Need to figure out how to motivate self to do things you actually want to do

Take the train
Walk around Portland and plug in at random cafes
Go meet some queer people 
Throw all of your shit away

Keep track of and share console usernames and/or friend codes


If your relationships are the most important thing I life, then you can use that as your project, one of thing things that keeps you alive. It's a puzzle, it's people, it's onversatiojs with strangers. It can be itemized and organized a little bit, would

If your relationships are the most important thing I life, then you can use that as your project, one of thing things that keeps you alive. It's a puzzle, it's people, it's onversatiojs with strangers. It can be itemized and organized a little bit, would it be weird to start writing down information about things, like keeping a log, voice recordings would be helpful, but I hate listening to myself talk. Wow oh man stay on track. Care abut them, even the ones that are invisible or have yet to appear. Keep track of people, talk to them regularly, especially your big extended family. Well the select ones as a focus, the others as distant branches, viewable over the fence. Even 
Think about if what you do affects the people around you in a good way, or just for you. That's fucking hard.

You enjoy romantic and friendship relationships more than sexual ones, most of the time. The romantic part and the sexual part are wrapped but, but it's more really like a person as a person = Want to fuck them. There's some standard of beauty, but it com

You enjoy romantic and friendship relationships more than sexual ones, most of the time. The romantic part and the sexual part are wrapped but, but it's more really like a person as a person = Want to fuck them. There's some standard of beauty, but it comes through difffernetly sometimes. Mike has made fun of me from my choice of girlfriend, but I haven't regretted a one. Kelsie and I were codependent, and very vey serious, but we had nothing, included our teenageded selves and the world around us, enough. We had fun but you were kind of a downer sometimes. I guess I like a good depression in a romantic relationship. A little ennui. I tried with Valerie, who I did always have a crush on in early high school, although honestly I don't remember enough about her to say why. She was tall, funny's, and had a nice smile. I took her to King Kong (2006). I didn't talk to her after that, I shut her out and I don't know why. Oh yeah it was kind of awkward, but we were teens, it was the first date I had ever been on. I used the. thermals to pump me up so I could call her. Pre-smart phones days for me. I though Emily was hilarious and really respected her as a fucking valedictorian (one of 13). She was so organized, she was everything I wasn't. Once we were making out, near the relationship, there was a moment, her parent upstairs, Will Smith 90s shoe on in the background, making out with her on the floor of her living room. The lights were turned down. Sometime during a frienzied makeout, she took off her shirt, bra, and jeans. It was the only time that happened. Maybe she wanted to have sex but we never talked about it. I sat around with my world fused to me, inseperately from everything around me. I thought through only my thoughts and didn't always regard everyone's else's. Man people are better in their 20s. She broke with me during Thanksgiving break, during her freshman year of college. I had settled into happy habits but she said we didn't have anything in common anymore. I walked her upstairs and asked my mom, tense, and asked her for 20$ so I could pay Emily back. I have her the cash, she left, I started crying, full on scruffy face, wet eye turnaround on my mom and step dad, and said she broke up with me. I guilted my friends out and we hung out at Perkins. There was one girl during the summer after Ashley that I made out with once. My best friend had started dating a slightly younger girl, one or two years. We hung out with her friends, who I think I had a straight forward relationships with, but we didn't ever break down the barriers. It was 
Maureen,
That one night were you crushed on that slightly younger thematic girl
Ashley (that's a lot to tucking unpack)
My wife
Intense friendships (and some not so intense, but important to the overall story):
Adam
James
Jon and Donald.
Casey.
Ben
Matt R a little
Ellie.
Shelby.
Megan.
New:
Drew
Jenn
Cassidy?
Co workers to follow up with
Rick
Tyler
Jason
My brother
My dad

You can't sing. You are bad at this. I heard them as dark and sharp. I didn't want to look at them and I all of this shit bouncing around. I've gotten random compliments of my writing. That psych prof, my creative writing professor. I wrote both off those

You can't sing. You are bad at this. I heard them as dark and sharp. I didn't want to look at them and I all of this shit bouncing around. I've gotten random compliments of my writing. That psych prof, my creative writing professor. I wrote both off those off the cuff, directly from the brain Stu: I should start letting that shit get saggy. Sometimes, says negative voice. I won't see if I heard them wrong, or took them to be more sharping then they were intended. Drew saw me listening to a band that he likes, which was why my player was open so someone could walk over and recognize something, but I turn into rabbit mode and just dodge and weave, caffeinated and spilling, responding to the words given to me, sometimes very literally. Missing context behind said thing and it takes time for me to figure it out. I wonder if that's from the auditory processing. It matches up with that one bad test. That I comprehend noises less well. I'm worried I can't hear chords, the individual voices, but hopefully that just a training thing: are these harder for me with my auditory processing? They are 100%, given the report draft. The depression is the waiting 3 weeks to write a check for a test, until after event they are no longer covered under your insurance. The writhes and moves and squims about. I need to feed my children.
Chris out 

When I heard someone say finish me when I was in bed, was that myauditory processing disorder?


Is the talking out of things that poop in my head the depression? Is it just the bad mind thoughts? You think of what you actually want to do all the time, but you smoke and chill and don't do much


Emotions?

Feelig like you should go do something because you read something motivational but instead just keep sitting on the couch

Money Talk - 11/18/18

What is the 101.50 purchase from oct. 18th?
Things we can do:
Sell car
Sell board games 
Tasks for next week:
Get Roku player on sale
Finishing Helens home nail kit
Figure out how to store makeup - long term
Eat out meal only twice - one is breakfast on Sunday

I could die at any moment, my family and friends could die at any moment. If I push myself when I don't want to I will be happy


Make a game with only rl flat objects that have been scanned in

I guess board game would work too, that would be sick. The limits would be very exciting and would produce something unique.
Even more limiting would be making them out of one thing, like a stack of hand written letters

Is it to ask for emails from people I meet o the street, like someone getting donations for a charity?


You crawl over your thoughts instead of expressing them.

Even to your wife sometimes, much more rarely. You are a floating, spinning ribbon of air. You are a grump. You check each line before it goes out. That is fine for life but you can be more open with your friends, it's your time to bare your own shit out and help them with theirs. I'm good at distracting people and I am good at listening, I am not good at taking. You are an observer and a distant shitty guardian. Be weak, be volnerable, be afraid, get hurt, suffer badly, fuck peacefulness, get your shit rocked. Dump all this shit to your therapist for the fucking thrill of it. Ask some questions that are way past the line. You like to think you don't have lines but they are thick with red tape. 

I don't want there to be something that becomes the reason I am the way that I am

Do I hang out with Jon Donald and James because we're all alike? Same with Casey? Are we all on the spectrum? Is there something physchologal to it? I don't want to have a label for whatever I am, even though at the same time anyone with a condition should know about because learning something new about yourself is not a bad thing, it's a gift. It can help you know yourself. Is a burden to ask other people what they think of you? Maybe ask about specific things? I just want to know why people like or hang out with me. Drew calls me brilliant and likes hanging out with me and seems fuibebely pleased a lot of the time. I hope I'm not getting on his nerves. He should talk with Jon. Maybe not. Jenna said Drew and I were her favorites from SIM and that fills me with a glow. It feels hollow right now, but it's there. Helen thinks I'm wonderful and walk on water. My mom knows I'm in my own head all the time, oh the fuddly smart guy like her dad. Make other people your project. Dedicate some spare energy on them. Make goals, make habits, write lists. Call Alex soon. Tell your friends you love them and their imperfections. Every has their shit, I believe that. On a pure personal level, everything is relative. If you don't have an experience doing it will be more intense. I want to meet people on the street and talk to them. I want to get to know the women who work at Peets. Is that presuming too much? Am I sucking up their time? I don't want to be taken care of or humored. I want to earn my place where ever I go. I don't want to be a burden. I should be an island. Yes I fucking hear myself. How do you do it? Opening up to people feels like a selfish act, laying your shit out for someone else to bear. Isn't that wrong? Do people want me to talk with them? Fuck even Jon says all the time that he would be okay with me sharing, but that's what I thought I was doing but I don't know if I am. I don't talk about my family outside of Alex and Helen, but I do sometimes. I keep a lot of shit to myself, who wouldn't. My family has gone through a lot and continues to go through a lot. My head is frizzy. Just bare all of your shit out to your therapist, that's what she is there for. Dump it al out, fuck who gives a shit what she will think, you know she will be helpful either way. Just go. What needs to be dumped: Lol I'm not witing that shit down

Fuck things, I'm too old for things, give me experiences


Me being afraid of dying or god or hell is still being afraid

Or anxious about a lot of shit
You play shit to distract you from the terror that can grip you. Why are you so scared? You are scared of so much

Marlo singer


If people were capable of slavery before, they are capable for slavery now


Amazon list

Accustic guitar, plus anything I need to start learning.
Nicer backpack, one that is made to carry a lot of shit.

Feelings out of nowhere have been there but just now have time to surface

Playing video games lets me zone out, and anxiety often comes free. It's not the video games, it's my actual anxieties getting a place to breathe. Same thing as when I go to bed and I think about all the things I really want to do. You distract yourself all day from what you are actually feeling. Cell phone, video games, marijuana. Reading genre fiction, escaping the actual life around you. It gets shoved down down down 

Steven gets his powers when he actually is feeling like protecting or with love

He can't do the moves without the substance. They are a reflection of the person inside. 

Chat chat boom

Server that Has actors managing connections to simple processes with socket. Simple processor run in a terminal and take a port on startup 

RtNotZ - Jim and Roland

Using fbones decks
House has burned
Roland- 1 mental trauma 
Scen 1 - 7 day

If I could die at any moment

Then I need to do the shit I want to get done. Not doing those things isn't shameful, but you can use contemplating death as a way to shift yourself forward to be the person you want to be. What are things you regret:
Tomorrow, set aside some time to talk to your mom and Alex. We'll work on d and e later. 

If I get a new job, I want to move to the east side.

I want to get rid of the caul that separates me from everyone else. They are there, I can see them, but I can't reach my feelings out to them like black tentacles wringthing from me, peircing through my reality into theirs. The touch of about her person, a look into the eyes.
Turn those weird visual thoughts I have into some sort of magic. Take my brain images and paint them onto a canvas

I want


Look up Alan Moore reading guide


Untitled

I don't remember how to write ad I cant see my keyboard so this may be roguht. I don't know how to write and I never learned to type properly. My fingers peck and the keys. my two my ginfers doing all of the work. 
He has two chilren that I know of, my younger siblings Dallas (This was my moms suggestions so she could avoid having a son with the name of her then-husbands father) James (his dad)  Bruneau and Emily Anne (My mom's middle name, and someone in my family that I can't remember) Bruneau. They are 19 and 17 respectively, I think. I don't like that I don't know. Dallas loves the Cowboys just like his dad, is a regiered Republican and started a collection of rap vynals. Emily sings with her father. She has been working on playing guitar and singing for quite a long time. She also has incredible short-term memory. Playing a memory game with her when she was younger was no fair, she would always win because she remembered what every card was. We had a set of a Disney Princess memory game that we used to play, in our house on Jennings Street (now torn down, which I felt no really emotions about when it was demolished). 
Dallas and Emily both have the blonde hair of their father's. Dallas' hair ended more brown. Emily's started as Strawberry blonde but the strawberry went away. People say she looks exactly like our cusin as a baby. They both grew to be slightly above average heigth, which we were not expected. They received something like a large torso from their father's side.
Last year, Chad got upset with his daughter because of her potential involvement with a pride parade, or so thats how it started. I've only heard the version from my mother. She had bruises up and down her legs and you could tell she got yanked by her hair. This is the only occason that I know of that her father hit her. I have talked very little to my younger siblins about their father. The basic stuff somes up and they know of what I think about him, but we've never gone into full details about it. 
Chad had a stritched Elvis rug that hung from some wall. I keep remembering it being up at my grandmas house a few blocks away from ours that all of my moms close faimily had lived in at one point over the 10 or 15 years she lives there. I remember his crying on Elvis's birthday, but I cound not tell you honestly if that moment actually occured. He was an Elvis impersonator. He also has a fondness for Conway Twitty. I remember him playing that part in Sheryl Crow and Kid Rock's ballad whatever-it-was-call-ed when Kid Rock sings (yells?) "I wanted to drink you awaaaaaaay", and imitating it over and over. One thing I can guess about Chad is that he likes to sing. You could infer that from Nashville and singing with my sister. I remember his having a guitar bit I can't recall him ever playing it. I remember the smoke in his car and the remastered Elvis song coming on again. He had special radio installed that was stolen one year. 
I can only infer what Chad's aspirations are through his actions and second-hand information. I haven't spoken to Chad for at least 10 years. I did see him briefly at my brother's graduation party. Chad was crying. He steps forward to receive a hug from me. I declined. 
I have never had a conversation with him as an adult. I often recall how many people's lives would be improved if he were dead. I would love for him to be dead. An accident would be best, suicide would be too much for my siblings and I really don't know if he would be capable of that. Hopeully not something too dramamtic. I don't expect to go to his funeral. I would love to give a speech about him but its hard to keep with just tje facts.
I remember his best from the years 1998-2002 when he was married to my mother. He lives wth us for the bulk of this time. I've seen him from afar many times since tem, picking up D and E or dropping them off. 

Untitled

Quiet afternoon, cold autumn breeze. The legs of the house shook in the wind. One boy and one girl sat outside on matching red swings, the bases stuck into the ground with clay. Chips of red paint flecked the dry grass. The fingers of the boy peeled and rip and his nail drug down the side of the pole, scattered more red into the air. The girl sat quietly, her long legs propelling her foot in circles in the dirt. Hills of dirt and grey and brown surrounded them. Positioned behind them by 100 years was a home. Contructed with lumber, the house had stood on this property for a century. The door, possibly once nice, was now rusted and decayed. Film covered the windows. The girl pushing herself forward and back and forward and back, motions getting longer and longer. The wind brought a wave of dust over the property. The mailbox at the end of the path fell open and its sign spun. A weathervane spun on the top of the house, point all directions. Yellow sun brought down oppression. 
A truck visible on the horizon. Just a dot. The boy and girl, without any discussion between each other, feel the muscles around their abdomens tighten. The girl looks down at the ground while the boy gets up to pace. He pulls his shirt down as he goes, covering up stretch marks and shame. The dot is closer, now visibly a truck.
Clouds of brown and dust drift up from the back of the truck. It's a blue truck. From a mile away the children know what it looks like. It's a rusted 19XX year XXXX XXXX, large toolbox attached to the front of the bed. Dallas Cowboys sticker in the window. The sun is starting to set. The truck pulls into the dirt path and it stops beside the house. The door opens, the door closes, the smell of smoke drifts out into the yard. The front door opens and shuts with a clink. The girl is standing to the side of the truck, trying to reach into the toolbox. Her runs her hand blindly though the box, touching tool after tool after tool. The boy is no longer there. It's snowing and 6 am. The yard is covered in gray and brown. The child's too-large-for-her t-shift is flapping in the wind and her neck is red with cold. She does not cry. If you could see inside of her head, you would see fluttering and shame and agony. Her face remains still. A XXXXXXX car rolls down the road, whipping up swirls of fluff. Her hand touches a small black box and she extracts it from its case. She pops it open and unlocks the driver side door. The truck is started, Conway Twitty song playing on the radio. She shuts the door and puts back the key and goes back inside. 
Twenty minutes pass.
The door to the house clanks open. The truck door opens and the truck door shuts. The door to the house opens once again and shuts slowly. An animal yell is heard through the crack, guttural and mean. The door shuts and the wind continues to blow. 

The Pursuit of Pain


I want to change. At night is when my amygdala releases it's grip or me, or maybe more precisely, my PFC rips control to dump out its logical terrors. I want to remove everything from my apartment. It's subconscious baggage that I can just ignore. You nee

I want to change. At night is when my amygdala releases it's grip or me, or maybe more precisely, my PFC rips control to dump out its logical terrors. I want to remove everything from my apartment. It's subconscious baggage that I can just ignore. You need so much less stuff. Start taking things to donate. Get rid of anything that hasn't been touched in a year (that's a lot of stuff). Sell some, donate some, just get rid of it. Anything that's left should be organized. 

Note

A race in a fantasy world stops being able to give birth. Maybe be a stretch to use this as an analogy to rl. The book is about the adventures to find a cure for their problem. They see how much their culture has intermingled, and on some level how little differences their are between them and their peers. There may or may not be a cure, but it doesn't matter. 

Have rules in system for consumption and recycling

You look up rules and guides for how to do things. You tend to follow those or at least think about them. Come up with your own guide for life, built up around things you learn and added to when you find a new topic.
Rules and standards for living. Think about what you produce and what you consume, including purchases like games or board games. You have to take the train because you want to reduce your carbon emissions and find out what else you can do. Wisely spending money is part of it. It's a resource that can be spent on new games or takeout, or it could be used to donate or buy supplies or take classes. Sell all of the books you aren't going to read.
Network and write down info about people. You think about this every single night.

Could I just set up Helen and Cassidy

They already like each other a ton

Stripe for buskers


I want to get a beer with Casey. The one bar with the chicken wings?


Playing Divinity Originsl sin 2 coop would be amazing


Maybe my need to add a blanket in the middle of the night is related to my possibly circadian Durham being off


Setting America was sold as shoveling the waste people aaay from Britain and sent to the what would be the USA


Laundry Routines Around the World




Note


Need to write pen pal letter tomorrow!


Get rid of tv

Remote the tv and put it away. Flip the shelf below it on its side, possibly putting the tv on top and filling it with the books we are currently reading, all 7 million of them. Make the books easier to get to, make the tv less fun to watch. Leave it for game night or movie night, or watching the good place. Love the good wife, but maybe only turn it on for folding laundry. Make the chairs surround the tv but also not make it the center of the whole thing: find something pleasant to put over the tv.

Have a witchy rpg night

Black clothes, eyeliner, candles, spooky snacks. Blood drinks? Scary food?

Suddenly the charm was lifted and they could remember everything

Suddenly the charm was lifted and they could remember everything 
All of the tiny, individual social memories soared in like a multicolored stream
They remember what he did to them

Separate out “public” slack channels from team slack channels

And start a squadsquad dev for just us sick devs. I enjoy organizing and administering spaces, like slack channels or a confluence site.
We need a sim random channel again. We should have a slack channel for bullshit, bullshit is healthy.
Should we have a queer friendly space? We barely have a woman-friendly space

Can't distinguish affect from speech

I have never been able to tell if someone is flirting with me. I think it makes me more attractive, but probably kind of frustrating. I can't tell when someone is saying something nice unless they state their intentions or I trust them and assume it's in good faith. I would be a bad debater, unless I leaned into twisting the words they actually said vs the message behind them.

Go to a shared workspace tomorrow and try it out.


Things are harder to process for me so all the extra processing wears me down. It takes me more to process things people say. When someone says they are fond of you, it's important.  You can learn to be more observant, but it is a hinderance. Maybe spendi

Things are harder to process for me so all the extra processing wears me down. It takes me more to process things people say. When someone says they are fond of you, it's important.  You can learn to be more observant, but it is a hinderance. Maybe spending time trying to figure everyone out would be really difficult. You experience things differently from some people. God lots of people have issues that change their perspective permently. Do you try to make everything casual because you don't do much else? Talking with people is hard, and you might have to have people state things more concretely. Ask people questions that you want to know because you can't intuit it. She wanted to repeat what she said before. That you have a hard time processing things. It takes more effort. You want to write everything down because you have a hard time remembering and processing things. You can't always believe your first thoughts on things, and this may be all wrong. But they are important because you need to learn to treat your thoughts as a honest friend and decide that you can't just listen to your thoughts. You have other things inside you that drive you. You have other voices besides the ones that talk the loudest or right this second. There is weight at your feet and sun on your hair and the feeling that the couch makes. It's not bring driven by the right now voice, it's the right now right now. Marijuana does you don't but the social anxiety is not helpful. Just a little instead. Rent a small office and make it your own. You would love a cave. A personal space. A tribalistic honor. Or it's a place to be on your own. Quiet. Close to new things. It's a space you can create and organize and focus in. It's your office. Away from your employer. Right down as many notes and have as many whiteboards as you want. Make it comfy, make it workable, respect and treat it like a friend. Set up your desktop computer, you can't use it at your house anymore, you don't like it there. Memories are tied to location and losing something you've had memories is hard. Going back to that location let's you rnember again. Your favorite place is he one you have the best memories in. Like your wedding day. Or seeing Harry Potter. Or it's playing D and D with your buddy at your coffee table or at the room rented from the university for your imaginary (but also real) club. 

Getting too intoxicated is immoral-woof immoral is too strong. It's less effective. If you smoke/drink too much, you gain negative side effects you could learn to save a receipt of everything you purchase and/or thing. I think about doing it all the times

Getting too intoxicated is immoral-woof immoral is too strong.

You have a legit damned therapist dawg


YA book

Protagonist is the overachieving sub heroine who always side steps for the chosen boy. In some sort of elite school or training program. Chosen buy gets all the attention, and isn't a little shit about it. He doesn't understand he's the product of a world that makes things easier for white little boys

What you do matters more than what you or others think about you

Thoughts and concepts are still just thought and concepts. No matter the amount of people who believe about the thing. People who have done things all do things a particular way, they actually do things. 
When I smoke I chill and hang out. When I don't smoke I am antsy and can't ever settle down. Computer games will do it sometimes when I am really into it. Otherwise I start and mess and search and play something for an hour or two. I'm never settled and never happy, when I am high I can hang and do some mundane activity for the evening that I enjoy and then I go to sleep.

I want to learn to sew clothes


Retro board game

Magic realm

Call main family members once a week

Call main family members once a week
If making detailed plans works for me as a solution, I should apply it everywhere. Find solutions, don't solve problems.
Rl with choosing path every room -> level -> Dungeon 
Event sourcing as means of keep track. Letting player adjust early stage and check against previous checkpoints may be difficult. If the check point is per room, that would be more manageable than “per frame”. Moving backwards is popping events off the stack.

Note

Wild wild Country - Netflix 
The mirror empire
Who fears death
Three parts dead
Bullet catchers daughter
Chex mix
Smallest diet soda

Normal 23 minute episode drama

Clone drama
Game that you play as a colony of clones. You are represented by a single persona, and the player knows that their pieces are each a clone or groups of that clone, so any weird action is possible. Would be cool to focus on survival and trading. Give each unique resources and force players to trade in order to build things. Maybe their colony wants to build something or wants a particular reosurce. Don't want to add too many layers to it. I want to play a game where no one can talk and they can only pass messages in caravans, but caravans can be raided. Have lots of cards that are blank on the front side that can used to bluff. Opponents see it as the conoly is doing *something* in a particular area, but it could just be a bluff. Or it could be something else. Communicated only through messages would only work as the sole trick of the game, otherwise it may get too complex or annoying. Games are about interaction. There could be a difference between the colony and the clones. You have you conoly, which is represented by a board in front of you, but you can also send your clones to other colonies and do actions with them. Trade, start problems, infiltrate. Colonies could have laws regarding whether they will allow others in or not. Play as right-wing paranoid racial purists or etho-friendly traders who value community and companionship. Maybe just don't have any striaght forward warfare. No soliders, no mass violence. Goal is to leave the planet, anyone who gets a person onto the first escaping ship (or ships leaving at the same time) are winners. Maybe have some sort of point system. It could be worker placement. Open or shut borders has a space thats revealed when turned up to open borders. Trades are done by putting your clones on an opponents trade area. Bluffing could be done by getting two special pieces that one represents an actual action, the other is a bluff. Or the cards are put face down with a worker on it, and are revealed when they activate. Maybe neutral 'ai' workers that block spots. Raiders, locals, etc.
Actions:
Trade: place worker on another players board with open boarders. Make a deal with that player.
Forage for resources. Draw from a deck and place card face up on your side next to your board. Card can be used for actions later (gaining resources mainly, maybe deck should be smaller so theres a scarcity of resources. Maybe every player gets one or two to start)
Maybe diplocamtic actions are done via cards, and cards are placed near the player who you are taking the action on. Maybe its a trade, maybe its espionge (flip over a hidden card, discard a card, disable a worker for a turn). 

Man woman,


Pen pan intro

Hello! I'm Chris, I live in Portland OR with my wife and 2 perfect kitties. I write software (server-side, java/scala) for a living. I got a degree in English in college, when I wanted to either become a game designer or writer. Instead, I stumbled into software development and that's where I've been for 5 years. I love to read (genre fiction, books about how brains work, I'd say literature but they just get dusty on my bookshelf) and play all types of games. I love introducing people to games that wouldn't play otherwise and I try to be a positive ambassador of games to the world. I also write a lot of words that don't leave my computer.

Dunwich

Rescued Warren Rice
Failed to save students
Jenny: 1 stress trauma

MH Stuff


Why I let my cat sleep with me at night

I get into bed around 8 or 9. I toss and turn for awhile. Usually within 15 mins of me getting comfortable, I heard a bang and frantic scratching as Lionel graves himself into the bed using his claws to tear into our 100$ sheets. He throws himself up, he isn't capable of jumping directly into the bed except for the rare cases that he can, which is more of a fluke or rare aligning of the planets. 
My wife stays completely still during the night so Lionel can stay comfortable and she loves it. Lionel chooses me every night at first. I assume it's because I'm warmer, and we keep our apartment at lower temperature than comfrtable for cats. We like to think they cuddle because they love each other, but maybe they do it to kee warm.
Lionel comes up to me and kneads somewhere around me. He curls around behind my legs and cleans himself. At some point he calms down for sleep. If I move during the night he owe at me. Rarely I'll feel a touch of a small paw on my hand, asking me to pet him. At some point my horny cat Kitty will saunter up to the bed, near my head. She splays out seductively. I know what she needs and she knows what she wants. I let her from head to thighs. 

Note

You are not what things you've repeated in the past. You don't have to keep doing them.
Therapy is going well. Mood is still so bad compared to before, and I was on antidepressants. It's been like this for awhile.
Do people still chat on Facebook or face book messenger? You used to be into that shot.
Just write down the stupid shit you think, like why you let Lionel sleep with you. What you have failed at and what your short comings are. Things people don't normally want to talk about
La Croy is way less interesting
No sex drive
I want to be able to flirt or be openly emotional about stuff even if it involves attraction or flirtation. I want to feel able to hug people or touch them, man or women. I want permission to do that so I feel comfortable.
i want openness and comfortable ness. I want it to be okay that I am attracted to other people, even ones I meet in real life. I want it to be closest and most comfortable with you.
I would do lots of shit given permission. I have no expectations about it otherwise. It doesn't concern me, even if the ideas still turn me on. Ideas and feelings are different than action.
I have always been this way, this isn't new.
I want us to set ground rules for things, even if they are things that sound crazy to them. Let's get this ironed out and stop feeling guilty about what sort of things we're into. Maybe not all of it. My god I don't know. At least the being attracted to other people 
Do duolingo out loud
Take the train bitch
Be happy with your small successes, but treat them like a happy stepping stone to new things 
Ken never really apologized, he almost regarded it as we had both fucked up but I wasn't the one who escalated things. He got snippy and I keep talking anywY, I tried to be honest the whole time. My brain doesn't work as well depressed.
I would like to go to a strip club

Note

Contribute to the non commercial spaces I pay tribute, treat the commercial ones well.
How to meet people through enjoying music
Go to a board game thing tonight
Find a group for Arkham lcg or Gloomhaven
Shop for band T-shirt's and shirt shorts
Practice keyboard
Learn to sew, make stuffed animals, and makes clothes
Meet people at shows
Start dating
All the same package is for cleanliness of imports. Maybe.
You def like some guys. It may just be the romantic = sexual. Which is not the case for every guy. You have no feelings for J or D or James, but you've got something for <redacted> and <redacted> I would love to hang out with them both. Holy shit that would be amazing
You don't have to be defined by your habits. Gaming is a curse. It's great and fun and good in small bursts but you know you can't do any of the things you want to if it's where you put the bulk of your attention. You want to sell all your stuff, learn to sew, play the guitar, go to shows, meet new people, volunteer, do good shit at work. Make new friends, start having things in common with new people. Try a huge variety of activities. Act. Sing. Dance
Go for a more witchy goths feel instead of just classy vanilla. Get rid of the video game shot an d replace with pillows and candles 
Learn Spanish

Untitled

https://rtla00122sv001.nike.com:4443/InternalService.svc/AuthenticateAthlete

Projects I want to work on maybe:

Start asking people personal questions and writing it all down
Write down my whole life
Watch OhMyDollar videos
Creative Projects:
What have I been thinking about?
Not games 
I wish I had a place to organize all the organizing I've been doing

You have to do the things you are meant to now, there could be no more later at any time. Be friendly, know the names of people. Sell all of your stuff. Be fab.


Supplies

Ja
Pendant 
Provisions
Medicine
Jo
Blanket
Canteen
Do
Map
Provisions
Ch
Compass
Binoculars

Untitled


Work Thing

Work remotely with grasshoppers. They work from. 8 am there is 11 PM here. I could do work stuff between 6 Pm to 3 am. Given 9 hours of sleep, that would mean possibly something like 3 am to noon at one end, or 7 pm to 5 PM at the other. Helen could not work with this schedule. 4 hours of online coaching time, documentation time, 4 hours solid ass development. It's a far more efficient way of spending my time. 8 hours of devops my is too damn much. People should be forced to do things besides development because it will lead to healthier engineers, which means better, ducts, more reliable work. I bet we could do our whole sprints with half the development time, maybe a 2/3rds reduction, if the other hours are given to them at their leasuire, given the expectation that you are also spending time work with engineers on things that are not code. Research. Studying. Coaching. Designing. Still keeping the same sprint cycle and ceremonies. Maybe worth staggering the engineers so their are some people acaible for questions. That may be too extreme. Not all devs can work on their own. Coaching for some should fall during work hours of others, but everyone still needs to have the same freedoms. All distractions  go through a single source (great groups). Go healthy and friendly to grease the palms to actually get this done. You have to do a lot of research first. Or just try it I guess? Am I manic at night but depressed in the morning?
Catalog people with their permission. The world would be better if everyone knew more about each other. Imagine trying to learn a little more about everyone you know. It would be in redouble.

Travel

I would love to sell all my belongings and work remote from around the world. Live cheap, carefully spend and take care of our selves. Learn to be young and experienced and not afraid. Take co from. Imagined control brings happiness (I read that today). I can survive in my currently life being disorganized.

Note

I should pay attention more to how I treat women and minorites. I am probably some sort of grey-A. I am not the same as the sterotypical man. That's really far away from me. I am going to take the train tomorrow and see if Donald and Jon want to get an early evening drink. Maybe I should be wary since I'm hanging out with them on Saturday. It's cool, I see them all the tine anyway. I just have to be in a car with them for 6 hours. 

Salami dream

A box of possibly sentient salamis. Thinly sliced, in rows. Turned into something more human like. I tired to cook them.

Apps

Finance:
YNAB - Budget
Reporting:
Swarm - Locations
Trailing: Life Cycle - Life
Sleep Cycle - Sleep
Trailing: Arc - Location
focus booster - Pomodoro
Notes:
Evernote - General
Trailing - Instapaper - Internet stuff
Ink Flow - Diagrams
Todos:
Any.do - Tasks
Breathe - Meditation 

Fantasy plot

Fantasy plot:
1. Boy with simple past
- first
- surname
- past:
    - He was a simple farmboy/cave-dweller/urchin/bastard child/orphan/orphan-urchin/thief
    - His family died in an ambush/died in a car accident/died under mysterious circumstances
    - He had a crush on the only other girl his exact age/He had a birthmark of a pile of shit/He almost drown, but survived miraculously.
    - Descriptions?
2. Wise old someone
    - traveling wizard, old knight, long-lost grandfather, angel of death
3. He had a best friend who was a 
     - childhood friend, animal companion, familair, hanger-on who just showed up one day, imaginary goat, real goat, talking head, talking mask, orb of pure light, a girl, statue who turned into 
3. Tragic circumstances, fleeing home
    - #home# was attacked by #monsters#, in the middle of the night. 
    - Town vanished, oh wait no everything was fine actually, no one died.
4. Get artefact from landmark
    - artefact:
        - guitar, bell, whislte, robins egg, sandwhich, tomato, statue of a <>, sword, axe, impractical sword, himself all along
        - landmark
            #adverb #adjective #location of #feeling
            sort-of handsome lighthouse of despsair
            super fluffly cave of greed
            way less than expected doomhouse of the feeling of smelling a new pair of jeans
            cave that gives lots of compliments
            the end of the world
        - gets into a fight with
            - savage beast!
            - unfriendly swoardsman
            - himself!
            - a clone of himself!
            - a clone of a clone of himself
            - sage crow
            - random passerby
            - bookie
5. Get into confrontation with bad guy, win, but oh no, that wasn't the real bad guy
 - bad guy
 And he learned that
 - the #whatever was in him after all
 And he fucks whats-her-name, right in front of everyone, everyone loves it
 he marries the shit out of right there
 her tragic death marks the start of his reign as king of the galaxy
 she dies
  - saving him
  - leaving him with an eternal grief that empowers him to keep on trucking
  - it was a prophecy, it's okay, she was probably okay with it
  - oh wait she's not dead, oh no she definetly is now
  Some shithole is dragged out of his bed and told he's the savior the world needs. He's like 'cool, let'
  s do it', kisses his mom on the cheek, and gets the fuck out of there
  prophecy is the thing that needs to be killed.
  same shit happens every 100 years, everyone is tired of it
  someone picks some random kid and calls him hero, writes a prophecy about it, gets him to do some mundane shit and gives him a few gold pieces
  kid learns theres nothing special about him at all
  pov is a friend/obligitory girl and the kid leaves and is given all of this loot and shit, she's like, weird, there's nothing special about that kid. Turns out there's isn't, its just a show that the aristoracts put on in order to keep the peasents distracted
  turns out its on earth all along
  There he is. That fucking look on his face. He keeps it all staight and laced, is all suprised when he's 
  Farmboy getting selected to be the hero is just another step in the everlasting road of the patricarchy. She learns she's supposed to die for him, and she's like, fuck that. When she keeps running away from the tasks the prophecy tells her she's supposed to do, everyone (including people that love her) tell her there's no running away from fate. She uncovers that the prophecy is a plot, has never been real, shes the true hero all along, there's nothing special about farmboy shit-balls. 
  Training class for special teen force. Haughty rich shit-balls and crew, nice girl, leader girl, quiet boy with a destiny. Leader girl puts the work in and keeps everyone in line, quiet boy with a destiny gets all the credit. He's ushered off to great-dom. Leader girl puts the work in, destiny boy just keeps on doing whatever he normally does. Reads a book, talks to catapileers. Destiny boy gets left behind and the prophecy falls apart, boy dies. Everyone blames leader girl (maybe girl-best-friend-but-also-otp) and she's like nah fuck this and goes and saves the world herself. Reveals it's all a scam. Is forgotten, but the world is a changed place.

ExpiratioNotes12202011


3,3,4,4,3,1,1,-2,15,1,6,3,2

Agricola

You are trying too hard to cha


Yet another hack instead of th


Writing something


Women have to work harder for


Why have all this cooking equi


When someone close to you tell


What stories do I hold onto as


We should have credit the cust


Tues night- playing game, saw


Tiny-small things I want to do


This isn't a mood thing, becau


The human before you is shaved


The bird


Super melee roguelike


Strength is subjugation of oth


Walking into doorway, turning

Sat down in chair. Light through torso and legs. Very minor. 8:53 am.
9:04. Lifted and adjusted my belt. Felt in right torso. Minor. Tingly.
9:07. Walking. Right turn. Felt in left leg, maybe head. Heard a small rush. Numb in leg. Medium, strongest all morning.
9:09. Adjusted in seat. Minor. Torso.
9:10. Spun in chair clockwise couple times, then counter. Very small, in head. Mostly just heard a small rush or ringing.
9:24. In desk, turned head to the right. Felt down right arm to the fingers. Specificity index and thumb. Fingers felt slightly numb for a couple seconds after. Repeated motion isn't reproducing it.
Felt it down left side and left leg a couple times while walking.
Both sides of body. Down fingers (index?) in left side, plus down torso. Maybe lighter in right side. Have felt in Palm. Started after getting up from watching movie, all right side, didn't last long.
Felt in right foot. Bottom of foot.
Felt in right hand and side. More when turning head. Light if just turning head.
Left palm and leg, not down to foot.
Both sides of body
Turning head or body
Turning through doorway
Getting up after using bathroom, usually out the door.
More prominent at work.
Backing up in car with arm on passenger seat.
Can hear it in head.
It hasn't been that bad recently, but that's happened before.

State of the world and politic


Sometimes it's okay to not del


Something that pulls down a pr


Small gps device that sends a


Short circuit your own thought


She shreds


Registration- actor for each d


Romaine lettuce (hearts), shou

Cool Whip

Replace usage of print tool in


Probably can track our lack of


Play less video games and no c


Perfect game-


People who do something for a


Peak erotic encounter-


Ordo fanatics


Notes from first couple days o


Red flower

Spotted ???
Potatoslimy d???n dr???
Moonlight grass
Fatty liver

Pull yourself out of your head

Look at this music I listen to, please make me feel cool.

My heart starts racing when I


My dad hides from stress too.


Monday 3-00 20th


Mon hun world-


Mob programming


Metrics not existing or not vi


Maybe no one is interested in

I want to shave my head and beard

Man rules parody


Maker space: group. Donald and


Make ebooks of my “journals”an


KODP board game


Kinesis data analytics


Just be Vulnerable, use some o


Let's shave our pubes together


Keep Talking and Nobody Explod


Jenna said drew and I were her


It's near to the section on th


It was really hard for you to


Is convincing someone of somet


If you can't rock your own ski


If it's been so long since we


If information in services mov


If I'm not looking for approva


I've gotten to where I am by s


I'm stuck in a cycle. Play gam


I think I was wrong about Jenn


I think I have to stop leaning


I started thinking about calli


I start to feel scared when I


I really like rules and care a


I played two games this aftern


I phrase everything I say so I


I need to start giving myself


I have problems with being wro


I have been fantasizing about


I have a daddy caretaker insid


I feel like my thoughts have b


I don't want to have a convers


I don't think anyone is owed a


I lie or exaggerated. A lot, o

LYering sales and refills on top of maybe foh

I don't like Shaun as a coach.


I don't get involved in game c


I do not see myself as a winne


I could start treating my inbo


I could build alex an actual n


I am dour a lot at work, I dot


I am disarming and smile at pe


I am an okay squad lead who le


How do you get the tech commun


Hi,


Hey Ken. I've been thinking a


Heart won't stop thumping, it


Goal, push motivator, pull mot


Generated context for each sto


Gender is cultural


Hello day Chris. If you are re

Take a break from gaming, do literally anything else please, show me we can be better

HC 27 21 21


Guilt! Guilt! It's guilt. I li

All my early memory about porn are guilt related. Looking up web games with a friend on his computer. Looking for porn on more regular web sites. A nipple was shown in a maxim photo and I almost freaked.

For a short period, move all g

     •     Board games
     •     Switch
     •     Handheld consoles.
     •    

Every morning (must be complet

Take pills
Wash gross areas
Brush teeth*
Floss*
Mouthwash*
Every evening: (before 9 PM)
Use wipes on face
Put on acne stuff
Moisturize
Brush teeth
Every 3 days:
Full shower
Monday, Thursday, Saturday:
Clean cat box

Ergo assessment and reading li


Ennagram


Don't trust day chris, he does


Doing one thing on the weekend


Do less stuff that's not direc


Digital calendar


Did the guys I lived with thou


Cucumber tests are not going t


Consume consume consume

Produce instead

Ceramics class


Can I accept this version of m


Beaty standards vs doing some


Apparently my mom is also blun


Cat hell

Vacuums: giant metal monsters
Their home: filled with dogs
PCs:
The queen
The trickster
The runt
The lover
The domesticated (snappier name needed)
Bio details:
Astrological sign
Breed
Short bio
Favorite meal
Stats:
Stealth
Savageness/ferocity
Cuteness

Break down of sim

Refill, Jersey 1, dynamo, 2-3 years old, etc.

Beginning of August, wed or th


Avadon 1

Kva
Gold crag -
scribe house
bandit house 2
Eye tamaras home - 8
Barracks 30 x3
Avadon
Secure cells

Armageddon-

This is

24:6:18 9-55 Am


Aliens come down and colonize


A developers history of SIM


18004917997


Note

A unit spawns and you play through their whole life, which gives them a couple characteristics from the tale. 

Make things, don't try to be perfect. Done is better than perfect. Think about what you think about and what you are interested in.

Make things, don't try to be perfect. Done is better than perfect. Think about what you think about and what you are interested in.

The Power of the Note


		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

		

